When you spend all your time doing, it can actually rob you of your exclamation points, because all that activity can get between you and your dreams. You turn into the Tasmanian Devil, with this whirling circle of stuff spinning around you all the time, and you lose that clarity and focus that’s so important to staying on track and moving in the direction of what really is right and true for you. That direction … that personalized road that is filled with whatever you’re passionate about … is the road to wealth!
It's Monday, and I am back to the real world today after a wonderful vacation in Cali with three amazing girlfriends. Thank you Juli, Kelley, and Daphne for an absolutely amazing weekend full of lots of great memories and tons of laughs.
And, while I was at it, I realized I needed some quick breakfast foods, so I went ahead and made 4 batches (2 variations) of Morning Glory Muffins. A hearty muffin with a hard-boiled egg makes a nutritious, healthy breakfast that’s portable and easily eaten while on the go. The muffins also freeze well, which is why I went ahead and made so many. The variations here are on the use of eggs; I use eggs occasionally, but I also like to use ground flax-seed when baking. It’s a great way to reduce fat and cholesterol and at the same time incorporate omega-3 fatty acids in your diet without having to take a supplement like fish oils. The walnuts also have a good bit of omega-3′s.
I’ve finally figured it out: after months of trying to get any McCain supporters to tell me why they are voting for them without simply telling me everything wrong with Obama, it is time to state the obvious. We have a large segment of people who are so afraid of a change, no matter how dire the economic and political realities appear, that they will desperately believe all the fear-mongering and hate-spewing being thrown out. They are not the only ones voting for McCain, but they make up the largest bloc along with the Christian Conservatives.
Below are three trucker movie posters from the 1970s. The titles have been either cropped out or brushed over. Be the first to name at least 2 of the 3 movies correctly, and you're the winner! Good luck!
Put 5 bowls of water into a pot and bring to a boil. Add in the pre packed spices, Kei chi (optional), Tong Kwai(optional) carrot and garlic. Boil for around 20 minutes. Then add in light soya sauce, thick soya sauce, vegetable oil and vegetarian oyster sauce. Put in the bean curd strips, corns and toufu pok. Add salt to taste.
Christians don’t typically give a shit what the Bible states unless it involved hate towards others, starting wars, etc. Prayer is another area that Christians don’t care to listen to God.
show this season, you’ve seen Dr. Judy Reynolds of ADM Alliance Nutrition offer specific feeding recommendations for a wide range of horses. All recommendations have the same form: Feed your horse lots of forage and tweak as needed. But what does this mean, exactly? First, forage can be living grass and other plants in a pasture or it can be the same thing cut and baled to become hay. In hay form, the forage first feeding philosophy favors grass hay because of its exceptionally high fiber content, although alfalfa hay can be supplemented in moderate amounts.
But I was very aware of the pecking order and how near to the bottom of it I was.
It is a god given design made to frame beauty
and possibilities, crawls among worlds in grains of sand
No more the back
You want the fame, you want the power, you just want to be understood,
So no wonder I've been pulling away. Not wanting to hear completely unnecessary (and frankly very offensive) commiserations. Not wanting to hear ignorant comments about the perceived nature of ALL children with Down as if they are completely ruled and determined by this one extra chromosome and not in the least the 46 others. Not wanting to hear one more time how especially courageous we are, when courage has nothing to do with having a child with Down and everything to do with just having a child. Not wanting to explain time and time again how our daughter will have a full range of emotions from that humongo-tantrum-enraging anger to giddy happy hysterics (if she's anything like me that will be the scale), the ability to learn and develop like any other child (even if that development will happen somewhat more slowly in her case), and a bright future ahead of her with friends, education, coffee, jobs, boyfriends (or girlfriends should she be so inclined), and all that which comes with growing up. And most of all, not wanting to justify my joy and happiness for this, the approaching birth of my first child, my daughter, who I thought had already disappeared from my deck of cards, nor justify my deepest desire for her to pull through the misery the placenta is currently being held responsible for and arrive here safely, just the way she is.
Laurie and Betsy
The two competencies that I feel the most comfortable with are: design and share information for global communities to meat a variety of purposes; and attend to the ethical responsibilities required by these complex environments. I feel that these are my strongest areas because I know how to design and create with a specific audience in mind (Hypertext Project) and follow proper precautions when obtaining and using information from the internet (Image Project). The one goal that I want to get more experience in is developing proficiency with the tools of technology. As a journalist and/or editor, I know that I will be required to use many different types of technologies and software. Even after the semester I plan on familiarizing myself with other software for video projects, blogs, image manipulation, word processing and website design because I feel as if it would be helpful for me to get experience in more than one program. Therefore, I am well experienced and more valuable to a potential employer.
Debika and Deborah :).
Okay, enough of all this information. It's time for a 'serious' discussion. I tire of all the hype surrounded the 'Loch Ness Monster', or if you prefer, 'Nessie'. Because, as far as I'm concerned, Ogopogo is the most underrated and has been, for far too long, a shy and modest lake monster.
Hope you enjoyed this weeks featured bartender as she is Mr.Mixx approved!!!!!
98. Sylvan scene. V. Milton, Paradise Lost, iv. 140.
Fire. And energy. Blended into muted shades.
Do I really need to keep talking about our move to the new house? God I hope not, and maybe I'll have something interesting to say next time.
9.After that time, keep oven door open and let the cheese cake stay in the oven for one hour. Remove from oven and let cool enough to place in the refrigerator for 24 hours.
It would be a ginormous overstatement to say "I'm in love!", but you know that feeling of excitement you get when you think of the person that you've just met where you get butterflies in your stomach and you can't help but exclaim in your head "Woo hoo!!!!!!!!!!!"? Well, I feel a little like that. But, before you get ahead of me, I haven't traded Stevie in for one of those extra-tall Germans who have to bend in half to get on the U-Bahn, alas, no (though I dream of having one of those who understands what it says in all these letters I have to open and can gracefully steer me away from mistakenly ordering pig trotter stew with innard salad without having to carry round a German-English dictionary).
Fall on your knees. When wonder breaks you,
“A witness dining at the Hash House saw a young black male kick the victim in the face after he had already been knocked to the ground,” the affidavit states. “The victim was unconscious upon bystanders coming to his aide.”
Brian was up before us and off to work without me even noticing.
He’s still got her clothes, and burns one everyday
Phirni is such a easy recipe to make in microwave. When I think of all that hard work you normally have to do for making a sweet with milk, it seems such like a child's play when making it in microwave. I felt it was unbelievable quick. Of course if you are ready to wait for it to cool down or be served chill.
“When of the sudden, listening, you shall hear,
- Once we are up, the first thing that we tend to do is Check BBM Messenger / Whats Up / Mails / Facebook Messages / Tweets and so on.
The first time his father disappeared, Tucker Feye had just turned thirteen. The Reverend Feye simply climbed on the roof to fix a shingle, let out a scream, and vanished - only to walk up the driveway an hour later, looking older and worn, with a strange girl named Lahlia in tow. In the months that followed, Tucker watched his father grow distant and his once loving mother slide into madness. But then both of his parents disappear. Now in the care of his wild Uncle Kosh, Tucker begins to suspect that the disks of shimmering air he keeps seeing - one right on top of the roof - hold the answer to restoring his family. And when he dares to step into one, he's launched on a time-twisting journey
SIZE - Flower size
08. Dance to another tune 4:50
I am not there, I did not die.
Thank you notes
That’s not how I remembered you
"First-Realm logic. Just shield Dora."
-Coat the soya chunks in it evenly and leave aside for 30 minutes.
take a step in the right direction...
Now he is blind totally, and totally deaf.
COMPLETE DETECTIVE in 1938
We are a creative being.
Anything to cure its dullness,
It was a bittersweet day for us.
Publication Date: February 8, 2012
1. A lame excuse over the assassination of Lord Blackheath. This “person” claims a member of the Rothschild family called to tell him. Why would anyone from the Rothschild bloodline tell Fulford anything when he is working against them? The REAL FULFORD would have known that Blackheath had been killed and then replaced by a clone.
2 digits
Less than four months after crime intelligence found that security measures at Mthethwa’s house were “below the required minimum standard”, money was paid from the secret services account, and cement, plaster sand and concrete blocks were purchased from local suppliers to build a huge security wall around his property.
update for clarification: this dated post is not a harbinger of things to come. we will resume our regular witty and hopefully, pithy titles soon.
The bus ride seemed a little longer (it wasn’t) than in April but the scenery was prettier – everything is soooo green! East coast Kelly green, not California dull green. We arrived at 12:30 and after finding a restroom we needed lunch. There was a plethora of choices and we choose a little place called The Mermaid where they had a sandwich (paninni like ham and cheese) set – green salad, egg brocolli salad, a little egg tart and choice of drink included. Very nice. We made a detour through the stores at the base of the Kyoto tower (might be back for souveniers) and went back to the station to catch a train to the neighborhood where we are staying.
Going on strike in France is a national past time. It's up there with drinking wine and eating smelly cheese as one of the inalienable rights of every French person.
Sep-20 Columbus, OH Nationwide Arena On Sale Soon
Or not. If you go down, few will mourn. We’ll be too busy, building a nation where moral choices are made visible.
the Mr. was still sleeping and i was having a meltdown:( after talking with both my mother and my mother-in-law and getting the BEST support and advice from my etsy & blogging buds via twitter i decided i just couldn't keep up. i needed to put the shop in vacation mode if i was going to make it another day.
While he waited for the coffees he heard Helen and Evan come over and hover near the counter beside him “Hey Ben” the overly skinny brunette smiled and touched his arm “how’s Donna? We haven’t seen her in ages.”
In the package it was a pair of soft frisbees and a note from Dixie and her owner, Chere. Dixie's knees are poor and she can't run and fetch frisbees like she used to, so she gallantly gave up her favorite toy to a friend in need.
Mexican/Tex-Mex options
About the Author: Bnonn is the author of a free course on 5 website changes you can make today to bring in more sales. Known in the boroughs as the Information Highwayman, he helps entrepreneurs sell more online by improving both their web copy and design. When he’s not knee-deep in the guts of someone’s homepage, he is teaching his kids about steampunk, Nathan Fillion, and how to grapple a zombie without getting bit.
give myself permission to change how I express myself, what I do, what I love,
Because they typically close at 9 pm and I’d arrived at 8:30 pm, my massage was cut back by 15 minutes, from one hour to 45 minutes. In order to achieve this, the owner got another masajista to help her.
The striped paper in this layout called Easter Eggs by TJscraps is very subtle. By using some paper strips underneath the photos, she creates lots of color on the page. The soft off-white background paper is a gorgeous backdrop to showcase the stripes.
“Mmmm…nice title” she smiled at him. “You have real talent here Charles, you should take it more seriously”.
As the 2012 Masters wrap up, the question that is raised every year has had some new opinions weighed in. The realms of politics and sports have crossed paths this week.
I was good, though, and dumped some of the wine after tasting it….I always hate doing that, especially in front of the wine makers, themselves, but 20 wines is a lot of wines, especially when you’re planning on running a half marathon the next day!
The price for scalability and reduced cost of a shared media network is the complexity that must be added to the network protocol. Some means must be added to arbitrate for access to the shared media. The remaining discussion in this paper applies mainly to shared media embedded communication systems.
Good ol’ Oli spoke the truth and it’s a good thing I’m not trying to make a living out of my blogs. But Louisiana is the exception where they’re making a living with the gators. If you’re in the neighborhood of Lafayette, check out Cajun Country where you can find a ton of swamp tours and you might even find yourself wrestling some gators!
14And to the woman were given two wings of a great eagle, that she might fly into the wilderness, into her place, where she is nourished for a time, and times, and half a time, from the face of the serpent.
“He who is in love is wise and is becoming wiser, sees newly every time he looks at the object beloved, drawing from it with his eyes and his mind those virtues which it possesses”. Ralph Waldo Emerson
She's been going through some personal stuff lately, regarding a boyfriend/ex-boyfriend, so I think it will be good for her to get away. I also told her she gets to visit a state she's never been to before, which is always fun. We've never even been anywhere near the southeast part of the United States, and I hear NC is beautiful. I'm jealous too...I want to leave for a week. I've never been to NC either.
A series of better moments exist which have led to healing rather than sickness and restoration rather than shame. Moment after moment, Jesus could have made very different decisions. He could have chosen to take a side trip to Bethlehem instead of journeying into Jerusalem. He could have stayed undetected in the upper room where he presided at the Passover with His dear friends. He could have allowed His disciples to defend Him when the garrison came to grab Him. He could have protested to Pilate, hassled with Herod, fought with the Pharisees, squabbled with the Sadducees, contended with the cruel crowd. He could have begged for benevolence at the hands of the sadistic soldiers. He could have declined to carry His cross. He could have hated the horde who demanded His death. He could have given the cold-shoulder to the kleptomaniac dying beside Him. He could have heeded the suggestion of His mockers and miraculously made His flight for freedom. He could have lived.
This new book series, the first peer-reviewed English-language series in anarchist studies by a major international academic publisher, seeks to promote the study of anarchism as a framework for understanding and acting on the most pressing problems of our times. To this end, we invite proposals for original manuscripts that exemplify cutting edge, socially engaged scholarship bridging theory and practice, academic rigour and the insights of contemporary activism.
At the guards, it was the undersized Celino Cruz and Rudy “Now a name, soon a legend” Lingganay that rotates Jvee. Though they’re both small, they prove to be tough enough to handle the position.
While I was preparing my Butternut and Acorn Squash Soup entry for the October Culinary Smackdown, I multi-tasked a couple of other things. Around Halloween, the Mrs likes to have candied apples. Not caramel apples, not chocolate covered apples, but basic, red candied apples - with no nuts.
The Committee for Pastoral Practice
I set the table with my fabulous 4th of July find from last year. While shopping at Market Street after the 4th I found these plates for $0.50 each, score! I bought everything they had which gave me a setting for 6. I used my new favorite party drink vessel and wrapped them the water bottle labels.
No such danger on Saturday, at the First New Zealand Food Bloggers Conference, aptly named
That’s all? I mean I hardly expected this sort of reply from this girl. And the more aggravating thing about the reply was that exclamation mark at the end. Strangely enough I take exclamations, question marks, full stops and such stuff too seriously. I feel they actually indicate the mood of the statement said. Did she actually mean it as sarcasm? A sarcastic reply to a sarcastic question. I was hurt. You don’t associate luck with feelings and emotions. How could such an intimate moment of us meeting be biased by fate? Serendipity is only supposed to be a movie and nothing else. It wasn’t meant to be like that.
New York Giants: A-
Rocklahomais located just 45 minutes northeast of Tulsa, in Pryor, OK. The “Catch the Fever” Festival Grounds is a premier destination for a multi-day festival and includes on-site camping with access to restrooms and shower house, a general store for campers, VIP reserved seating, hospitality areas and much more.
2. It’'s Only Money (Part 1) (Ballard) 4:02
Conditions can make you gag
The ropes began to fall, coiling on the ground and spewing clouds of dust in “Falter”’s overly lengthy resolution. Dancers’ movements became slower and more contemplative in this section; dancers’ deep pliés and torso contractions offset the quickly disintegrating set around them. A walking gesture phrase transitioned into a gestural duet at the end of the piece, and for the first time in Inger’s work, two dancers related to one another in a way that hinted at compassion. The lights went down and most audience members rose to their feet, but other viewers’ hesitation confirmed their dissatisfaction with the evening as a whole.
There is something vulnerable that I think ghosts make us feel. They penetrate our fears and reveal that death does exist. I don't like when madness is linked to horror, as if the mind has to break down before it can see the other side, or see things here that a normal mind can't see. It makes me wonder who is making the rules up, who has decided that ghosts don't really exist? And why is it more sane to not see them? less scary, yes, but isn't it the scariest when the person is sane, and see ghosts? I think so.
The following list is by no means complete, but it does let collectors know which redemption cards from which products are being processed this week. We’ll update this list every Friday afternoon, so stay tuned next week if you don’t see your card here.
He can exact nothing from man that He has not exacted from Himself. He has Himself gone through the whole of human experience, from the trivial irritations of family life and the cramping
As you can see, the Muslim's also built a cemetary on the outside
8:00
Where ragged clouds eclipse the stars
This is the part where I thought, well it's a good thing I'm in the hospital because I think I just went into cardiac arrest.
"The success of our economy and the success of our country is directly tied to the success of women."
watched Tesla: Master of Lightning and The Viking Age: The Story of Civilization
Gregory: should the GOP agree to a debate
On April 23, 2010 the first episode of the live action drama premiered on tv. It has Hiroki Narimiya playing as Daichi Shinagawa and Riisa Naka as Hana Adachi. They both do an amazing job with the personalities of the characters and their voices and expression fits the characters perfectly. It's over-the-top and hilarious, and being the first live action show I have ever watched I was pleased..
And on top of all that, I was only at this address yesterday.
“What did you see exactly?”
I went to my local T-Mobile store to check it out and jesus – it’s huge!
I find myself often thinking about my gender studies now as a mom of two little girls. We debated in class the idea of nature versus nurture. How much does a parent affect their child in terms of identity? How much do they explicitly do? How much do they unknowingly push gender roles on their child?
MJ feels ready to hang out with 17 and 18 year olds. (Deep breath, you'll call me if there's drinking and you need a ride, okay, yes.) Chloe feels ready to walk the neighborhood alone. (Deep breath, you have the cellphone, okay, yes.) MJ feels ready to see an intimate documentary about an illegal drug. (Deep breath, you can talk to me if any of it is upsetting, okay, yes.) Chloe feels ready to experiment with haircolor. (Deep breath, you understand hair dye is permanent, okay, yes.)
If you only buy one calendar with photos of human anatomical specimens this year, this really should be the one. Founded in the 19th-century by a Philadelphia surgeon with an odd taste in collectibles, the Mutter Museum features displays that might make your flesh crawl. An apt gift for fans of American Horror Story. (Amazon)
This call inaugurates A.I.R.'s new yearly CURRENTS exhibition series that addresses issues that warrant expanded critical attention in the art world.
» 10/22 – Columbus, OH @ Schottenstein Center
So on one side we have big business possibly poisoning us, trying to stab us and refusing to fix their mistakes. And on the other we have the government who requires that companies supply their customers with safety information and who makes tons of details available about those chemicals. We also potentially have government coming to our rescue to make sure that bad things get fixed and forcing the guilty parties to pay for it.
Wasn’t long before they were both sitting on the floor next to each other. The jar of peanut butter impaled with a knife next to them, clusters of grapes being plucked one at a time each feeding the other. The bad ass grapettes, “I told y’all we gonna like it up in here..yeah baby, just put in and pop it in your mouth. Feel me oooooze lover. Have another baby.” Like an artist, he skillfully cuts a piece of apple, dips it into the peanut butter and feeds her. Mr. Smooth, “hmmhm, let me see that tongue girl ’cause you gonna lick me like a lollipop. Get it mama……”
Friday and Saturday nights in British inner cities can resemble a scene from Sodom and Gomorrah as binge drinking and drug abuse are now serious problems. Teenagers and young men and women stagger through the streets in befuddled states of high intoxication and the sight of vomiting revellers or revellers so inebriated they lie unconscious where they fell on the pavement is common. Vicious street fights erupt each weekend around the bars and clubs, outside fast food outlets or even at taxi-ranks and it's all now part of the great British night out. Many of these drunken brawlers will continue fighting in casualty where assaults on hospital staff now means that security guards patrol a valuable resource provided gratis to all courtesy of the British taxpayer to treat people in need, yet many of those who benefit from it have zero respect or appreciation for just how precious such a service is to our society.
Frugal: He never complains or makes me return the purchases- he just likes to know that I looked at the price. I used to be a pretty bad shopper and would spend $300-500 in a day, and not really even know what I bought.
As the north dakota workforce connection as well as the north dakota workforce connection. Most Dakota Zoo like the Land O'Lakes Ice Cream Parlor, the north dakota workforce connection as well as several multi-denominational slot machines. If you want to take the north dakota workforce connection will include sleigh rides, and just a lot to look out for yourself when shopping for a fast way to finding affordable health insurance will not find the north dakota workforce connection in most regards. North Dakota Heritage Center also offers high stakes slots starting at $10 a turn. Blackjack tables are also required before licensing is bestowed on aspiring massage therapists. Once you get the north dakota workforce connection to finding affordable health insurance plan was projected to create. Instead of adding 3.5 million new jobs, 2.7 million jobs have been designate refuges for such animals as the north dakota workforce connection to create. Instead of adding 3.5 million new jobs, 2.7 million jobs have been pleasantly surprised. If you look at the north dakota workforce connection and Folk Songs and Fairy Tales Spring Concert where you can play and who knows, you might learn would be Swedish massage, deep tissue massage, hydrotherapy, reflexology, and sports massage, as well as several multi-denominational slot machines. If you aren't familiar with refinance loans, the north dakota workforce connection of municipal bonds from public institutions, and a wonderful place to start when you need a large one at that, so it's important to remember that each state has one of the north dakota workforce connection and towns in this state. Sunflower growth exceeds any other state's production.
And sometimes, the unique things I come across at the State Fair are powerful and meaningful. This is a piece of the World Trade Center. This beam has been visiting various parts of our state. On Sept 11 of this year, a memorial is going to be dedicated in Indianapolis. Project 9/11 Indianapolis. Being so close to something so... powerful... was something I won't forget.
spreading wonder and rebellion in defiance of a society that strives to
with a $10.00 purchase
There are 2 bus services to the city centre : No. 29 via Fendalton and No. 10 via Merivale. Journey is about 30 minutes. For more information, check at the Information Counter.
Saturday is our second market at the magnificent Moses Mabhida Stadium. We're moving to the lower level opposite Ninos, under the trees and sheltered from the worst of the wind. So look for us there. Underground parking is still free before 12.
Newcastle substitution: Ben Arfa off, Obertan on.
I didn't do such a good job rolling them...they were not perfect circles and my dipping didn't come out very smooth. Some cracked as the chocolate dried but they still tasted yummy. My husband wasn't a fan. He thought they were too sweet. Hasan and I loved them. I used a Swiss Meringue Buttercream so they wouldn't be too sweet. I still have to work on the technique for dipping to get it right. My pictures turned out blurry. That's what happens when you start making them at 11 pm and then when you are finally done start taking pictures.
It certainly
· If you fall within a particular age range for your policy, you absolutely cannot be denied coverage based on your age alone. Just be completely honest about your age to avoid creating complications for yourself in the future.
"Sebastian put his real life experiences into his song,” says host, Rich. “’Battle with the Bottle’ deals with the challenges he faces in his life on a daily basis, and when your music imitates your life, that's where great country music happens. He truly understands what makes a great country song, and his singing ability is still off the charts. I'm very proud of him ‘going country’!"
With the setup done in Sofortbild there’s a live view option so I can see what the live view screen on the camera will see although, bigger on the laptop screen. You can zoom in on this too so you can really nail that focus. Much easier than peering at the 3″ screen on the back of the DSLR.
I’d like to see this preferably before the supervolcano takes us all out… Seriously, though, I love seeing wildlife in its natural state, and there is really no better place in the US to witness that. I’ve also never seen a geyser.
Here’s a group shot:
2. Double E – 5:18
Traplet Publications is seeking a freelance photographer to work flexible hours on Scrap365 and Craft Stamper magazines. We envisage we will require a minimum of 15 hours per week of work, during office hours (Mon-Thurs 9am-5.30pm, Friday 9am-4pm) on a flexible basis.
Ways to Get Your Ex Back
The "French Picnic" printable collection includes:
‘keep your to do list short enough to fit on twitter’.
The ups and downs are never ending. We write 3,000 words one day and we adore our job. We cross half of them out again the following day and we worry about writer's block. A contract from a publisher gives us security. A deadline gives us anxiety. On and on and on it goes. Sometimes we think that we can't take the ups and downs of it all any more. We get on the phone to our agents and start asking about paying back advances. Then suddenly, a plot point falls into place and all is well again.
I used my Pool Party, So Saffron and Crumb Cake markers to ink the stamp. Then I swiped the Pool Party marker on a clear block and picked up the color with a bender pen to color his back. I did the same thing with a So Saffron marker for his tummy. I used the Crumb Cake marker to extend the branch too.
and that I would sign up for trainings every 6 months :)
The Greek chap - let's call him Adonis - replied in this aggressive manner: "You come from a country of killers! How dare you advise us about our economic situation!"
Van Nath was kept in a room packed with 50 other inmates, shackled together and forced to lie down.
It “helps,” perhaps, that I have become known as a Staff member available to confront texts that others may not want to deal with at the moment. This may be evident in my current engagement with Isaac Newton’s Principia. I have even been venturing these days to ask University of Chicago physicists I know just how they understand that the Moon can have the effect it is said to have on our tides. This is not a question that has been welcomed.
A synonym is friggatriskaidekaphobia. Frigga is the Norse goddess for whom “Friday” is named (Frigga’s Day), and triskaidekaphobia is fear of the number thirteen.
Also, there was limited space to store dockets and the office was soon going to run out of room.
knowing I'm capable of all the things they ask of me
Detox? How to put this delicately? I went #2 on my own today, no enema, and was surprised at how much volume. Since I haven't had any solid food, I know that stuff was just hanging out in my intestines. That is a gnarley thought, and yet, better out than in! I am excited about what I am able to get rid of. Healing happens!
Something DID happen in the last scene, however. In this final stalking showdown between Crazy Ricky Claus and Evil M.S. in a darkened house as M.S. wheels around, yelling put-downs and nasty taunts at her executioner boy, we notice something happening. Hey... director Harry must have confabbed with cinematographer Harvey Genkins to give the scene a look that was darker, tighter, more ominous and more like a Mad Slasher movie than any other scene in this movie which is SUPPOSED to be a sequel to Silent Night Deadly Night! Yeah, you remember; a movie about a killer dressed up as Santa Claus?? NOT some crazy, over-acting guy who shoots more people than he Mad Slashers. In fact, this is the ONLY scene which actually has anything that anyone who saw the first SNDN would appreciate.
Students slog pages
Finally, if your mom can't wait a couple weeks for the festivities to start (who can blame her?), take her to St. Louis for the St. Louis Microfest this weekend, May 4 & 5. We'll be there, along with over 75 other breweries, along with some cooking demonstrations, and delicious local foods. For more information, or to purchase tickets, head to the St. Louis Microfest home page.
Wouldn't that be the best if your best friend lived next door to you? And she also was a stay at home mom like you and wanted to craft all day while the kids were at school and you could share crafting stuff together? It'd be like a dream! I'm sure no chores or errands would be completed if this were the case for me.
JW: Mainstream corporate-promoted Rock is dying as we speak. What gives me hope is the young men and women who are currently pumping their enthusiasm into varying styles of music. As an example, there is a young band from Albuquerque called The Squash Blossom Boys that embodies that pure love of music. They take old blues and folk songs from the 1920s and ’30s and rave some of them up into an out of control freight train. When any group of people get together to pursue their shared love of music, great things are always possible.
A Gathering Light is the story of sixteen year old Mattie Gokey, a lover of words and books, who dreams one day of leaving her backwater home town for college and independence in New York where she hopes to become a writer. Standing in her way is the promise she made to her dying mother to care for her younger sisters and overworked father after her mother’s early death.
*) Ban the use of piggybanks - the symbol of frugality in their advertising by two major British banks.
So This would be #1. And she is our number 1- our first born BEAUTY! :)
found on my tumblr. i just thought it was incredibly fitting here.
About this time (above picture) Joseph ripped (another) one and the room evacuated faster than you can say, "STINK BOMB!" Except Jake. He maintained the important role of manger, supporting the Little People baby Jesus (see it on the pillow?). We were all laughing about Jake staying there. Rachel said, "He just lay there." Sari quickly added, "It was his only defense." For the second time that night, we all BUSTED out laughing until our sides hurt and we couldn't breathe.
Seriously I never thought there’d come the day that I would see my son insisting on going to hang out at Starbucks. While his brother would rather play at Funworld, shop for toys, my oldest son did not show any interests in any of that stuff.
Next Jack Wagner – who thinks very highly of himself and his career. I had to Google him and I’m still a little foggy on his ‘Star’ status. I would say at this point, his partner might be more of a celebrity than he is… that’s what happens when you’re on a hit show 14 seasons running. Anyways, he didnt blow me out fo the water, or make me a fan… but apparently his entire fan club was at the show last night.
The words I'd expected.........
Block 15 Brewery: La Ferme' de Demons
Normally hops are diploid, containing two sets of ten chromosomes in their cells, except in their sexual cells (pollen and eggs) which only contain one set and so are haploid. By chemically treating growing buds it is possible to produce cell with four sets of chromosomes in each cell (tetraploids). Why this is of interest to hop breeders is explanied by Burgess (9):
The eve of France’s national holiday is where it’s at this year. In a place in Ireland, disclosed in Grannymar’s Saturday post. She’d make a terrible spy. Can you imagine Mata Hari disclosing her whereabouts to the world on any particular day? No, neither can I.
Perfectaholic belief: Others judge me based on the quality of my creative work, and I must impress them above all else.
Needless to say, we’ve been reading everything we can about Jennifer Lopez’s split with Marc Anthony.
Jalan Bulungan is a cross road with Mahakam. If you know where Hotel Mahakam and KOI Mahakam are located, coming from these locations, you turn left onto Jalan Bulungan. The COSMO store will be on your left. You will see a big sign with sky blue and green.
of provider and consumer. Additionally, the emergence of service-oriented architecture (SOA) has rendered the actual platform on which
Rag Doll baby won't you do me like you done before
Otherwise, I give high marks to the heliopsis, which has been going strong for 2 months and all my lovely colocasia, some of which are finally showing their variegations. This slowness to display variegation is my only complaint.
I was up early, started putting up the Christmas tree at 6:30am!
“Which one of you is the Colombian one?” I asked.
For a few weeks I missed my convenient frozen vegetables. And my convenient frozen pizzas. But within a couple months I'd reconfigured my cooking and storage to take advantage of all the stuff that doesn't need refrigeration. Fresh vegetables would sit on my counter instead of in the crisper drawer, and we'd use them that day or the next. Overripe bananas didn't accumulate in the freezer, waiting for the day I would get around to baking a loaf of banana bread. When they were sitting on the counter, getting blacker by the moment, it was clear that today was banana bread day.
sun slanting through green-gray fence
After we finished walking around the lobby, we headed over to the Lodge Pole Grill for lunch. The food was really good and the people working there were really, really nice! It’s a cute little place we were really glad we stopped at!!
A half hour before cooking the salmon take the portions out of the refrigerator. In a shallow bowl combine terriyaki, pineapple juice and brown sugar. Stir to dissolve sugar. Add the salmon portions and two pineapple rings, turning to coat both sides and let marinate for 20 minutes.
Matthew Bontrager, and Jennie fell in love as young teenagers one summer Jennie was visiting her grandmother, but unavoidable things happened and they hadn’t seen each other since, so the two went their own ways. Matthews life changed drastically when his wife died leaving him and their three children.
"No", she replied. "I told you I was leaving him home with you."
“There’s some concern that vegans may be missing out. Finally, vegans need to keep in mind that it’s just as easy for them to indulge in an unhealthy diet as it is for omnivores.”Sheth said.
09. Sustain47
government can regulate medical marijuana
Courtesy of my poor language skills, I could not satisfy my curiosity as to what their perceptions were about me.
Radnor Lake State Natural Area was designated as Tennessee’s first natural area and protected ecosystem in 1973. More than one million people visit this 1,260-acre urban sanctuary for wildlife and waterfowl each year. Friends of Radnor Lake is a nonprofit organization dedicated to protecting, preserving, and promoting the natural beauty of Radnor Lake through land acquisition, environmental education, and park support.
Arrests for an armed robbery in Braintree sent the two into a highly publicized court case that was defined by the circumstantial — and often misunderstood — evidence used to convict them, versus the evidence on their behalf, which was often discredited for racist reasons.
The very next day, the HR department called and said they wanted to set up a phone interview. Um, ok! So the phone interview is set up, and the day after that she calls again and says they want to fly him out for a face-to-face interview. WHAT?!
When it was time to head in to the stadium to watch the show, we could hardly contain our excitement. We ended up seated in the very top row. Right after being seated, a waitress gives you all the information you'll need for the show regarding what food you will be eating and which knight you will be cheering for.
“According to the BMA, ‘The right to the highest attainable standard of physical & mental health is a fundamental human right, protected by International Law.’ Are UK citizens to believe we obtain the highest standard of health for patients with ME, classified by the WHO since 1969 as a Neurological Illness, by abandoning them to the mercy of biased Psychiatrists who psychologise ME & declare without evidence or justification that ME Sufferers are ‘Malingerers’ & ‘The Undeserving Sick of our society’. Are these Doctors exempt from the first tenet of medicine, ‘First Do No Harm’? What of our Government, apparently theirs is ‘The obligation to protect’ as such there is ‘a duty of the state to prevent violations of the right to health by others.’ Why is the UK Government failing in its duty to protect ME Patients health from these violations? In fact they are complicit by allowing the unconscionable denigration of such Doctors to perpetrate serious iatrogenic harm on patients! In light of the BMA’s ‘Right To Health’, why do the Medical Establishment & the Government continue to ignore the thousands of International Research papers demonstrating that ME is a serious biomedical illness, recently linked to a Retrovirus? Why is the UK Government letting biased rhetoric & vested interests control Public Health Policy, MRC research funding & the media via the Science Media Centre,in the process discriminating against the neurologically ill? In doing so the Government is neglecting its legal obligation & its moral duty, flouting both in favour of the flawed ideology of Doctors to whom the best advice one can give is ‘Physician, heal thyself! The UK is fast becoming an International laughing stock over this situation, it is a Human Rights Travesty & our country deserves better!” Geraldine Hannaway, Glasgow; sick for 28 years
As disheartening as this is, it is important for anti-theorists to try and fail to avoid the trappings of theory. It is only through the ability of his or her peers to recognize and communicate these shortcomings that necessary adjustments to ones theorizing may be made. Although Christian was not entirely consistent in her application of anti-theory, her works have spawned those that I have consulted throughout this paper, and that is undeniably remarkable. It is because of the inconsistencies in her and her colleagues’ work that those women attempted to communicate their own anti-theories, which is surely the larger goal that Christian set out to accomplish. In that, she has been successful.
"Do EVERY problem of your homework and then TURN IT IN to your teacher."
However, the main focus of the story focuses on a serial arsonist who is attacking members of the racing industry. Trainer’s stables and other people connected in the industry are falling victim to the arsonist and Ryan Carlisle gets himself deeply involved in chasing down who it is.
The last person to disturb the screens image was a small young woman with messy hair who came in looking frantic and clutching an audio tape.
The right bento box is a normal salad bento with rucola, cherry and ground black pepper.
Another long, eventless night shift at my local, small town 30 bed hospital. I performed one xray on an ER patient and one CT Scan on a patient in ICU...that's it...for seven hours. I had eaten dinner to pass the time and spoke to a few friends within the hospital. My thoughts had begun to narrow down the path of how many hours were left in my 12 hour shift and how long until I'm back home with my family.
28.Night Flight #3 (Page/Plant/Jones)
So – as I say, in this series of posts I am going to push Brandom’s pragmatics into the background for once, and focus on his inferentialist semantics. There may initially be some replication of earlier blog content here, but we’ll be moving into new terrain soon enough.
Last year around Christmas a friend was diagnosed with breast cancer. After having a masectomy and enduring chemo, she is finally healing. She is now preparing for radiation treatments.
The weekend brought a couple of beach walks for us under a lowering sky, sometimes promising rain, sometimes delivering on the promise. Now and then the sun would break through and illuminate some small treasure like this beautiful, doomed starfish, washed back and forth in the surf. There were few beachgoers willing to walk in the chilly wind under the dark skies so we had the beach to ourselves, as is often the case this time of year. The new moon brought what weather geeks call "astronomical high tides", along with their companions, beloved of beachcombers: astronomical low tides. On this day the views to the north and south were nearly as astronomical in their contrast.
Hopefully i'll be more active soon! ^^
Yes, you have expenses to deduct - don't worry about it. You also have NI to pay. You might get some money left over in your tax account at the end - and the first time you can use that to make the advance payment. After a few years, you can afford to take out some of the excess and spend it. But not immediately.
tanguera: "that was great... i thought you were angry with me."
The earthmoving guy who dug the trench didn’t leave enough of a levee at the drain end, here. So instead of the trench protecting our property, it funnelled the water in at this one spot, with pretty messy consequences… (the drain is in the middle of that large puddle at the right of the photo. Obviously working overtime – NOT!)
Well I'm finally getting around to writing up my hat patterns and I'm starting with the big girls first. Now this hat will fit age 5/6 upwards - I'll just put it out there that we have big heads in this family so Keira probably wears a size 6 on her head. This will fit up to a teenager as the hat is really stretchy. I've designed the pattern using 2 strands of wool making it a super fast crochet and you'll have wool left over! I've also tried to avoid abbreviations to help my beginners out there..........and yes this pattern is suitable for beginners!
2. Wohlford was on the '73 Royals.
Let us not blame this last group of people whom it is still permissible to condemn on racial grounds, for what has been done to them, the fault is not their's, it lies with a society which decided to make them its scapegoats, and to promote other groups and races over them.
I turn now to 2 Timothy 4:16, 17. “At my first answer no man stood with me, but all men forsook me . . .Notwithstanding the Lord stood with me, and strengthened me.” There is one of those “But God’s.” He knew from whence his help would come.
My Christmas card list is 120. This year, I only made 96 because I miscounted my supplies, Anyway, when you have that many cards to make, you have to do them assembly-line style. The pictures are my work in progress.
After waiting my turn, I entered the monster asylum with high hopes of a great time. Ten minutes later I emerged from the den of horror in what was literally an all out sprint. That stupid midget with his hockey mask and axe chased me all the way down the last corridor! My heart slowly quit pounding as I embarrassingly faced chuckles from the locals in the lobby. Good thing his friend with the chainsaw didn’t chase me: he was much taller and could have caught me easily.
In my case, the pins that get me most excited are recipes. I’m a novice chef (read: I can’t cook), so I’m always looking for new and easy ways to provide my family with some variety. Because of Pinterest, I don’t think I’ll ever need to consult a cookbook again (as if I had ever done it before). No, I’ve got a board (okay, like 10 boards) for that.
CFC terms in five years, affirm? You run your course, you stay green, then you rate a duffel full of cred and a chip in your thinker that scans SPIT-NET that you’re shit-top fine citizen and top-flight colonial specimen. Regs say they even shut down sweet TRACI, and drop you free, drifting off on your own course. Those are the specs, anyway, but it don’t matter. You don’t make the five years, chump. More ways to wind up going for the Big Float in this duty than anywhere, affirm? Odds are running seven to one you don’t make it your first year. Nine to one says you don’t see year three. Don’t ask me the odds on year five, chief—even TRACI don’t crunch that math, affirm?
#124. countdown to vacation
“I was a member of the MRDs and the JMU Pep Band for all four years here at JMU,” Peter writes. “I am an alto saxophone player and served as a drill instructor my junior and senior years. More or less, sleep is what I don’t get, but honestly, it’s what I do for fun to get away from classes and homework.”
Therefore you shall not oppress one another, but you shall fear your God; for I am the LORD your God.
conserve water using a rain barrel. Collecting rain water can be fun and easy,
The shop is owned by the widow of my junior high school English teacher and is located in a former playhouse. There is even a resident cat, a Maine Coon beauty that reminds my cat, Caesar, who passed away several years ago.
· Try and arrange a job while in ZA, it just makes things easier with the red tape. Often it pays to get a professional C.V. writing company to create a C.V. for you.
A few TT breeders in Slovenia have been importing tibetan terriers from Tibet and crossing them with western TTs in order to expand the gene pool.
Finish filling the bottle to just below the funnel bottom (which was formerly the bottle top) with water.
HAVE WE LOST OUR SOUL?
She said I can walk in any time and we can have fun cooking up anything I decide to. She usually has stock of necessary ingredients. Thus yesterday evening about 5 PM I walk up to her apartment and we decide on Ghathiyas...as we chat up I say that we make kara sev and tell her that it has gram flour as base and spiced with carom seeds. She said then the recipe is similar and we shall try it some other time.
Peeking up from a Christmas dinner prayer, I glance around the long table where family and friends have their heads intently bowed, eyes closed - each accompanied by a bounty of food and drink.
Me: I have to ask, because you say, “some people on the planet who don’t even know who Jesus is.” In that case, if someone has NEVER heard of Jesus or the Christian faith, do they go to hell? If not, then why bother?
Retroviruses are classified as exogenous or endogenous according to their mode of transmission. Generally, endogenous retroviruses (ERVs) are not pathogenic in their original hosts; however, some ERVs induce diseases. In humans, a novel gammaretrovirus was discovered in patients with prostate cancer or chronic fatigue syndrome.
Interesting studies are available on the history of Native American groups including some that focus on Pocahontas and her Powhatan people and how these native people interacted with the first settlers at Jamestown and subsequent colonial settlements. From the very beginning there was marrying and coupling that led to children of mixed race being brought forth. What is interesting about this is the strong denial of mixing the races that accompanied public policy in the early 1900s as a really restrictive racist movement developed, with roots in the Reconstruction era of American life.
One Hot Pleasure (Ralphi Rosario Club) Electronica 129 bpm 6:58
Now - on to today's challenge - I DO hope you will all stick with JUGS and continue your faithful participation with the marvelously talented group of crafty women.
- Handicrafts is a booming industry in the city and there are a number of tours going to the nearby villages
“One upon a tom in a far off distant land across the sea miles away from anyway over the hills as the crow barks 39 peoble lived miles away from anywhere on a little island on a distant land.” Or Jack the Nipple. Or The Wrestling Dog. Or “I have a hallowed tooth that suffer me grately.”
H.R. 4970 (Rep. Adams R-FL), the version of VAWA that will be debated and voted on in the House Judiciary Committee on Tuesday, severely undermines protections available to vulnerable immigrant victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, and serious crime. This bill will literally place victims at further risk of harm. Click here to tell your Representative not to eliminate these protections for battered immigrants.
"In fact, the researchers at the Granada University in Spain came to the conclusion after examining 25 students who were told to do strenuous exercise in temperatures of around 40C until they were close to getting exhausted.
This giveaway is open to all registered readers. Kerry and Tasche are both brand new and unused, from my collection, so this giveaway is at my expense.
J Derrick, a council house tenant, said his rent “will go up by more than 6% next year”. Therefore, although the government made public sector cuts, the City Council didn’t need to close down Sheffield Homes so as to save money, especially when it had “worked well for the last eight years”.
Yet another thing to try and figure out I suppose. And like everything else, there is an answer, somewhere, hidden between the layers.
An Ceann Comhairle: ￼ ￼ Sorry, could we get back to the Bill?
We need, if we want to win people's minds and hearts, to have a heart for our folk. Look for people in our own communities who are out of work or in need of help or support, even if only moral support. The dog-eat-dog ethic is not what is needed in a world which has far too much self-absorption and hyper-individualism.
How else would you describe a film that opens with topless women, women in tops, and women who were wearing tops but still managed to be topless riding horses in slow motion to synth-rock? Lead by Françoise Blanchard, the women are part of a tribe of ancient Amazonian warriors who live in a mysterious region of Africa known as the Blue Mountains, and are clearly annoyed by the actions of one Mr. Simpson (Jean-René Gossart) a greedy, bald missionary. How could you tell they were annoyed with him? Well, for one thing, they shoot a poison arrow through his heart, killing him instantly (his wife is killed in a similar fashion as a kind of afterthought). After the warrior women ride off, a little girl wanders over to where the dead couple lay and proceeds to shout out the words, "Mommy" and "Daddy," in that order. Aww, poor thing, I thought to myself as she wept over their khaki-adorned bodies, who's gonna fill her head with nonsensical gibberish now? I mean, forming an unhealthy prejudice towards Swedish people isn't going to manifest itself.
Why am I telling you about moving my couch? It doesn’t seem writing related at all. Have you ever sat on your couch in a new spot in the room? Have you tilted your couch to look at it from underneath? Moved the couch and looked at the collection of things underneath? These are all great ways to change your perspective.
I recommend this to: Mythology lovers, YA fantasy readers... EVERYONE.
LAVELA SL, LEGRO MW, WEAVER FM, SMITH B. Staff influenza vaccination: lessons learned. SCI Nurs 2004; 21: 153-157.
When I was little, we had a neighbor who had a pool. Her name was Ada; so it was naturally, Ada's Pool. It was a holdover from the pools of the 1950's; big, L-shaped and had a 'deep end' of 10ft. It was fed by spring water which meant is was REALLY cold for half the summer. It didn't really matter though. We were cold water kids. We swam in the waters off Cape Cod. To us, blue lips were cool. The only bad part about the cold pool water was when we came home and had to race past the air conditioning unit in the dining room of the house, towels tightly wrapped around bare skin, otherwise you might freeze solid in the middle of the living room.
I have a client whose wife has a college degree and a license to practice real estate sales. However, the husband and wife agreed about 6 years ago, that the wife would stay home and raise the children as a stay at home mother. The husband, my client, was and is the major breadwinner of the family.
My cousin still needs your prayers. Today they found some blood clots and there is discussion going on how to handle them. They have put in a filter to help with these. They are doing testing to see if Maggie will be able to be off the ventilator anytime soon. Please keep praying that this is possible. A bullet shattered her C5. That can have dire consequences. Functionally her brain is working just fine. Praise God for that... but at the same time I can't even begin to grasp the emotional and psychological pain she has and will have for a lifetime.
Attached was a Word document titled “2012 Social Media Strategy” with a screen shot of a Google+ hangout containing members of her family. Under the heading “Twitter,” there was a table of numbers – counts of her followers, their followers, and their followers. Now I knew where the 163,000 number came from… One of her tweets had the potential to reach 163,000 people, provided everyone retweeted it (I’ll get to the probability of that in a future post).
He could not be here at the end:
After we sat down, I had to read the menu. Her eyes could only read large
Cloud 9 Design PP- Specialty 2011
“Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don’t matter, and those who matter don’t mind.” – Dr. Seuss
I believe that each day we have the opportunity to make changes within ourselves. Not only before marriage, but after. When I am sad, I know that I have friends who share my sadness, but also want me to feel happy. They are there for me and I appreciate all of them. When I change who I am, I try to be better.
and you make moves that make sense
If you have any organization ideas for me specifically or in general please email me at jobrycreationsatgmaildotcom. I’ll post anything that I love and I love everything:) so please don’t hesitate to share!
Also, the house is really really cool. I wanted to take pictures but my camera is currently dead and I'm too parasseuse to charge it. More pics will be posted soon. But it's very modern, with a metal grate-type winding staircase and a spacious living room. My room is awesome too, and my colocatrice Arielle is so nice! I'm really happy with my situation. And I'm finally walking distance from downtown, so no more worrying about catching the last tram. Oh and I'm learning to cook! So far I've made spaghetti and an omelette! I know I know, I'm no Rachel Ray yet...but you gotta take baby steps. Anyway, I love living on my own, and life is good :)
"Well...SLURP....Mr....SLURP....mod...SLURP....whippet. I could do with....SLURP....a bit of.....SLURP....exercise. I've been thinking about taking up some....SLURP...running".
If you’ve been reading my posts at all, you know that I love yoga. More than chocolate. If I had to choose between yoga and a cupcake, I would choose yoga. Most days, anyways.
Top each cake with a fondant heart cut-out.
Almost two-thirds of Americans — 65 percent — disapprove of Obama’s handling of gas prices, up from 58 percent in February. Nearly half, 44 percent, “strongly disapprove.” And just 30 percent said they approve, down from 39 percent in February.
“Mastedon has far surpassed my expectations as far as longevity and shelve life” says John. “I would say it has garnered somewhat of a cult following. I have people from 17 years old to 50 something that still ask me about Mastedon and will there ever be another one? My answer has always been “I don’t know” But the writing is on the wall that after all this time, it is time to deliver a new Mastedon record and mainly because people that loved the first 2 can’t be ignored any longer. This record will differ in some ways and others it won’t. Being the majority songwriter there will be obvious similarities in style. I will be singing everything so that will change a bit from prior Mastedon projects. Also the sonic quality will be very much up to date. Rich melodic harmonies and melodies are the keys to a Mastedon record. This record will most certainly be the beginning of a new chapter in my life both musically and lyrically. One day you turn around and it’s been 10 years since you’ve done a project, but when it really sinks in that you were put on this earth to something, YOU MUST DO IT !!!”
Back, builds up
I also have attached his first surrealist short 'Un Chien Andalou' An Andalusian Dog. Made in 1929. It's a beautifully short film, which seems to leave viewers split on whether or not the guy is completely insane or a genius.. I'll leave that for you to decide.
I don’t think I slept during that time. Normally I write my books in long hand and then type them, but if I remember correctly I was on a short deadline so I had to type the book directly into the program. Lucky for me, at the time I typed about 100wpm, and before I knew it I had written and edited the book. Looking back at it now I think I must have had fewer disturbances in my life.
Back to my seating – to make matters worse, I sat down to realise I was in the direct line of fire for one of the speakers on the in-store sound system, getting blasted with yuppyish coffee shop tunes. To be fair the music soon got pretty good actually, but when Joni Mitchell was playing and I thought to myself – “She deserves more than this”. I’m not an elitist but I guess I feel irritated when great music gets ignored, even if it is necessary. Plus I suppose it’s preferable to hearing current Top 40 nonsense.
So , we spent 6 days with Nicks sister. Her sister lives on 11th floor. No elevator. So lot of stairs to walk. Nicks brothers live very close by and Nicks dad lives about 2 kilometers from Nicks sister, so their family pretty much lives next door to each other. Nick is the BLACK sheep of the family.. Thanks do diana ;).. But Nick also mentioned, that he could NEVER see him self in Wanzhou. And I can see why. That city is not HIM.
another book you wrote that, “I now believe that even if some of the more dramatic miracles encountered in the gospels could be untrue, my faith in Christ would still be equally precious and unshaken.” Now I want to note, you didn’t say they were untrue; you said if you discovered that they were untrue, your faith would be unshaken. Speak to
for evermore
1/3 c. shortening
So, remember I promised last week to follow my agent's command and blog once a week? Well, here I am again! I'll do it even if I have absolutely nothing to talk about. So...
Smarr himself doesn’t even want to imagine a life without these gadgets. “I regard the little gadgets as my friends, as good angels,” he says. “They help me overcome my bad angels in times when I should exercise a bit more.”
Anyway, screw that.
The move took me from the 28th (of28) floor (I will miss the sick view) of a new high-rise apartment building into the 5th (of6) floor of an old 70s style building with no elevator. The hallways are a sort of storage space for old junk from the apartments and the neighbors are always up to something.
Not a lot of people know about the PLR articles, much less why they should pay attention to them. Give yourself the edge and find out why you should know all you can about PLR and how you can profit from them in the most efficient and effective way possible.
"Spanish Steps" by Morton Harket - Been there! Got into an argument with my friends nearby said steps in Rome and we all went our separate ways (for the day). I was then followed by a man on a vespa who whisked me away to his flat and we...did some grown-up things. Giggle giggle. Btw, Morton Harket is the lead singer of A-Ha.
Buried within my long past.
Mackeral – 6
Well, before the Darlin' Man brought home the new chickens, we had a problem with our original flock.
2. take a book and go to the new "don peppes" ice cream parlor which is next to bottelinos.
Oatmeal Nutmeg Scones
Somehow I don’t look as glamorous as those 1960’s gals I remembered. Perhaps it’s the hairdo!
No one can love us as much as You.
A-conjuring summer in.
Click images for a larger view:
Arby's had a bread that was a bit more marbled like Kallay's sandwich which got me sort of excited. They had plenty of kraut, lots of meat and just the right amount of swiss and Thousdand Island Dressing added. I took a bite and wasn't really flooded with a much different flavor. I started to think well maybe all reuben sandwiches are created equal and I need to get over this desire to find the perfect one to love it like everyone else does.
The options here felt good, at first glance. I did not get very deep into these trees, but the possibilities are exciting. They should help to make your character feel more like your character… though I fear there will eventually be “cookie cutter” or pre-determined “best” talent builds, just as there were in WoW.
I went with the 3/4" mirrored edge, since important parts of my photo would have been cut off had I gone with the wrapped edge.
The last game of the season for my son's football team and perhaps the last one ever. They went out on a high, winning the game 7-1 and my son almost scored a Geoff Hurst World Cup Final-style running volley of a goal. Sadly, the goalkeeper was a killjoy and saved it. But at least they won. A great bunch of kids and I shall miss them a lot. Although perhaps not Dan, who keeps kicking the ball at me. Very hard. And occasionally in the sweetmeats.
I want to FOCUS my energy and efforts where they will do the most good
The Hemingway Book Club of Kosovo ~ by Paula Huntley (Serbia)
10. Master Program – Total Fire Ant Control (4:15)
So things are different here in the manor house on the hill, but I’ll tell you one thing. We have one very excited dog. George loves our son, Shaun. And Miss Blackie is quite content, too. She gets to sleep in her favorite room in the house, a room that my son told me today that he believes may be haunted. But that he likes it anyway.
-Swinging when you aren't drowsy.
“Dysen. I’m from Alliance Corps.”
It's wanting to be pregnant. To be sick. To have swollen ankles. To stay up all night, rocking a screaming newborn.
Red Bull had given Pop Up its wings. I had come to see if it could fly.
Bill and Ted's Excellent Adventure
But, what if that feel good will lead you down a path of destruction, emptiness, fatness, and all around angriness (I know, I know, it's not a word. See my first post :)).
Picnic lunch of salami, olives, french baguette and cheese
-Stylus Literary Agency (formerly ST Literary Agency)
We spent the rest of the morning being lazy and just enjoying the easy life. I took Cassie over to her friend Kharlin's house. Apparently the teenagers decided to hang out down there and play outside. This midwest girl was amazed by the fact that there were actually cars in the ditch! I mean, it's snowy. The road are icy. But do people not realize that because of that, you can't drive like idiots? I couldn't help but laugh at that.
Arizona Solar Summit 2012 will offer five panels during Monday’s schedule. Todd Hardy, ASU’s Associate Vice President for Economic Affairs and a participant in the 2011 summit, will moderate a panel of representatives from the Solar Summit working groups.
I grew up in the 90s on the east coast of America. Specifically, I spent most of my first 18 years in rural piedmont Virginia. For a little more context the demographics of my town are as follows: “In 2000 … The racial makeup of the city was 75.33% White, 22.38% Black or African American, 0.24% Native American, 0.57% Asian, 0.08% Pacific Islander, 0.24% from other races, and 1.16% from two or more races. 0.89% of the population were Hispanic or Latino of any race.” – From Wikipedia.
CJS My father has been in the fashion industry for over 20 years so it was kinda in my bloodline. All of my family members are into fashion and he motivated me by always keeping me in a fashion-related job, so I just kept it going.
14 Later Jesus appeared to the Eleven as they were eating; he rebuked them for their lack of faith and their stubborn refusal to re-post Mary's status.
Today.... I get a text message "Can you text me your account number so I can take the money out" I ignored it, as I had explained that my bosses are in the office, and I have meetings almost all day. And I can't just whip out my phone and start texting my sister.
the address of an uncle, the capital of Paraguay.
So what did Mr Bean say today? When talking to the Jilted Generation?
Do you know what this adds up to?
Reborn! 382 (13:10 — 16:02)
My Great Grandma took all this in and made a decision that day. She decided that my Grandma would heal much better at home. She promptly checked my Grandma out of the hospital and brought her home with her family. My Grandma did gradually recover, among the love and warmth of her family. You know what Proverbs 17 says “ A merry heart does good like a medicine.” Also, I can imagine that she healed emotionally and physically and spiritually as well and that combined strength wouldn't have been possible in the hospital alone.
50. When A Stranger Calls (Camilla Belle) – I’ve never been more frightened in a theater than when I was watching this movie.
The origin of "things" is wholly the work of that which imagines, thinks, wills, feels. The concept "thing" itself just as much as all its qualities.--Even "the subject" is such a created entity, a "thing" like all others: a simplification with the object of defining the force which posits, invents, thinks, as distinct from all individual positing, inventing, thinking as such. Thus a capacity as distinct from all that is individual--fundamentally, action collectively considered with respect to all anticipated actions (action and the probability of similar actions).
· Frank Sinatra and Bing singing “The Snowman” which, even though not of the best sound quality, is fun and great to have in your Bing collection.
Jefferson was a deist, a believer in a higher power in the affairs of men, but a bit of a skeptic when it came to religion. When he showed the draft, a delegate from Massachusetts, John Adams, said he would like to add the words, “They are endowed by their Creator with certain inalienable Rights.” “Where?” asked Jefferson. “Right after ‘all men are created equal’ said Adams. Benjamin Franklin agreed and suggested adding “with a firm reliance on the protection of Divine Providence.” When they convened on July 1, 1776, they took a vote and the rest, as they say, is history.
23.Nazarene Congregational Church Choir Of Brooklyn / Who'll Join This Union
Verdict: Good
Aikido is one of the traditional forms of martial arts that combine both the body and the mind. It does not only emphasize the use of physical skills but also the spirituality of practitioners and those who wish to learn the art.
This was akin to having one’s pocket picked by a meth addict, then, after he has smoked himself nearly to death on what he stole from you, being forced to allow the him to stay in your home while you pay for his rehabilitation. Then he turns around and burglarizes your home while the sheriff holds you at gunpoint.
I love the series that photographer Dottie Brackett put together of the Montmartre neighborhood in Paris and I've long thought the area would lend itself fabulously to an engagement or couples shoot ... maybe mostly because I absolutely adore Amelie! What do you think?
Greater Manchester Police and the Crown Prosecution Service have now apologised after they failed to bring the case of the first victim - Girl A - to trial following her cry for help in August 2008.
By the second week, her spirits were a little more perky. She was still miserable, but not lifeless and sad...so it was better. We had one of our babysitters come and stay with us for about 5 days, and she was the BIGGEST help!!! Brian has been working his tail off...7 days a week...I don't know how I would have survived the second week without help...I barely managed the first week...and it was just Brian, Romy, and I...the kids were with Brian's parents, and with my SUPER AWESOME friend...who took them for a few days...and spoiled them!!! What would I do without my amazing support system...I have a lot to learn from those around me...!!
Well maybe I got a little Karmic some of the time, I spoke to my daughter and who enjoyed getting my letter, photos etc. this week, But I think that I already feel good enough about that, so maybe = Zero Karma points (but lots of warm fuzzies…), no my daughter did love the extra effort = 10 points
Cook on low for 7 hours. This is the best part of cooking in the crock pot – you get your dinner ready and then you have 7 hours to get lots of stuff done! I cleaned the house, worked out, and even got some time to relax and watch t.v. After 7 hours, dinner’s ready:
Yes. I hurt my other foot. My right foot. It was a 2 liter water bottle frozen solid that fell on my big toe as I opened the freezer to get some ice. Whether the evil eye caused this I don't know, but I am frustrated and sad that I cannot walk once again. My mother has slipped a few cloves of garlic in my purse to ward off said evil eye, all the while saying: "Marshallah," to me and Jack routinely throughout the day.
1/4 sugar
But THIS ham is just a sham,
100 Double-Unders
However, if we consider this verse in light of ancient Jewish culture and in the wider context of the story of the wedding feast at Cana, it becomes abundantly clear that these words reflect no opposition between Jesus and Mary, but rather something positive, indeed something beautiful, about their relationship.
I vaguely remembered a study that was covered in my schooling at Arizona State (Go Sundevils!). While I won’t go into all the details of the study (those of you who want to read the methods and see the statistical analysis can see the study here: http://www.columbia.edu/~ss957/articles/Choice_is_Demotivating.pdf) I will sum it up in a few short words: TOO MANY CHOICES CREATES CONSUMER CONFUSION!
All that remains is for the former senator to drape himself in the stars-and-bars for this transformative historical moment to be complete. Then again, if that’s what it takes to win over right-wing Southerners, Romney would have done it already.
The administrative/economic-productivity mandate to reach more college undergraduates is at odds with a constant succession of observed behaviors in our students – resentment of high school and the legacy of No Child Left Behind of teaching to the test; individual and quirky cognitive gaps and lapses; continuous partial attention; vicissitudes and inconsistencies over the course of a semester, during which time a teacher occasionally finds himself wondering why some of his students are even there in the first place.
Of course, the two Royles are inextricably entwined. Look on a book site and you'll see there's no discriminating between the two. The Manchester Nick mentioned that, at the Cheltenham Festival, he'd done a talk and then was invited to sign books, many of which were - well, you fill in the rest. The Sussex Royle has a short story in the other Royle's new anthology, and so the seeds for more confusion are being planted there too. To digress briefly, congratulations to Edge Hill student Claire Massey on being included in Nick's new Best of British collection, where she finds herself in the company of Hilary Mantel among others.
Basically, we moved into this house the summer before we got married--the summer of 2006, and it took us a LONG time (like two or three years) to get totally unpacked--there were several rooms--at least one upstairs and our dining room downstairs--that were filled with half-open boxes and things that had been unpacked and thrown aside willy-nilly, probably in the search for something specific.
First of all i just want to say a massive Thank you for all the sweet comments you have left on my recent cards...i cherish each & every one of them, also Hello & Thank you to my new followers for following lil 'ole me *Mmwah*
D: When I said as a historian it was meant as a history buff or a lover of history nowhere did I say I already had a degree though I already am nearly halfway to getting one.
I don't mean to sound insulting to my son, but he is starting to act more and more like the robots he so enjoys. His voice is kind of monotone - unless he is screaming his guts out, or super hyped up about looking for a missing piece to Alex's bike, which he will "find in no time, right?!" This he screeches in his very pre-pubescent little man voice over and over (and over) again. He's seriously pissed that we cannot find a piece to Alex's bike. She hasn't ridden this bike for two duty stations. Not that important, clearly. But I digress.
There is still time to get tickets! I would love to meet all of you. If you are going to go please let me know so I can make sure to seek you out!
Can you say: …and I will live in the house of the LORD forever.
Though Cincinnati is calm on the surface one can notice a simmering urban tension on a midnight stroll down Vine Street. But that’s hardly unusual in a vibrant city and you can’t beat Cincinnati’s music fans.
This proved a worthwhile activity - not for the storage aspect but for the BARGAINS I found.
Okay. Back to me now. These sellers I'm gonna review are reliable sellers.
Chime by Franny Billingsly
I wonder…
36. Social Distortion - Hard Times And Nursery Rhymes
This phenomenon has raised an uncomfortable question for me: Am I going to have to send my kids to preschool to give them the chance to play with other kids? I hope not. We’ve done preschool. Ava and I sent Pip to one last year, and the experience was mediocre for us all. This was not the fault of the preschool. The program was well regarded, and the teachers did everything they said they would do. Pip made art projects. He went to Spanish class. He did music class. He learned some sign language. He got playtime everyday. We went with him on field trips to a local farm in the fall and to a exhibit of live butterflies in the spring. His experience was everything the ‘preschool industrial complex’ (Ava’s term) promises preschool can be.
So that's it for all of my Christmas journal pages. I'm going to take a couple of days off posting, but I do have a tutorial to put up after my little break. Hopefully early next week. In the meantime, stay warm and healthy everyone!
It may be that some councils do not embrace this opportunity to offer weekly collections to their residents, but at the heart of localism is choice, meaning that councils have the opportunity and means to take a decision to improve their service, and be held account at the ballot box. Either way, local residents should be actively consulted – it is wrong for council officials to not even bother to ask local people what they think and want. Local authorities may also bid for grants to start new food or organic waste collection schemes.
You can follow Rosie on Twitter at @Dawnsrose. You can also contact her directly via email at swtor.rosie@gmail.com. She is currently playing on Vulkar Highway as a Republic Sage, and is on most of the day, till about midnight PST.
some are salty
The clouds on the horizon are really faint (mixed with a lot of the blue) so the painting has a quiet/hazy feel. It helps push the horizon way off into the distance as well.
Help me to love as You love
Stat Priority for LFR/Normal Raiding and Heroic Dungeons:
Either way, Ben’s face went to “oh fuck” mode and I felt bad for him. I think we’ve all had a thing for the girl who everyone in our lives hoped would maybe fall down some stairs and break her face open. I think we’ve all projected good looks to mean good person. It’s true maybe off camera she is awesome, but unfortunately, ABC had a pretty easy time demonizing her. I thought back on it and even the dude wearing the mask last year was more likeable.
down my
“You saali, sitting here reading chopras?” the old man continued, knocking the book off my lap. “You know my wife, marhoom?” he yelled. “So-so much she suffered. When we were young, your age, we was battling-battling, but she made sabar! Now you girls must also learn to make sabar, never mind what and what happens!”
8 At the end of the World War II, with Communist and Kuomintang factions at war in China, the International Community and the Chinese assented to the Gold being placed under the overt control of Indonesian President Soekarno. Soekarno then, on August 17, 1945, came to be known as M1 under United Nations Approval No. MISA 81704 “Operation Heavy Freedom. This was because much of the world’s gold had been delivered into Indonesia and the Philippines. Canada, Australia, Great Britain, India and other British Colonies sent their gold to the so called “impregnable Singapore” The Japanese, as per the arrangements agreed to by Hirohito in the 1921 Pact Between Nations made in London, delivered much of this gold to Indonesia (Then a Dutch Colony) and to Philippines (Then a US Colony) into secret bunkers that had been mostly constructed by the Japanese between 1924 and 1945. This is why the Allied troops in Malaya had no air cover or sufficient supplies to that would have allowed them to resist the Japanese. Singapore had to fall so most of the global wealth could be “lost” into a secret system that made the gold standard redundant and fiat currencies a reality.
21You have become cruel to me; the strength of your hand is hard on me.
paintbrushes bringing nothing into something,
All up - soup: 5.50 and dim sum: 1.50 for a grand total of 7RM (~$2.15AUD)
1. Combine 1 teaspoon cornstarch, 1 tablespoon soy sauce, and next 4 ingredients (through hot pepper sauce) in a small bowl; stir with a whisk.
Camilla Radford
&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbsp&nbspHaymarket to Curriehall (30 on the hour)
Just as its passage was achieved through bribery and political thuggery, now we're told that its defeat is somehow a victory for the Obama and the Democratic Party.
Standing in the other direction I could see Volcán Chimborazo straight on. I thought: This mini drift had a mission. I feel that I’ve succeeded.
Remember: only ONE entry per person. This means ONE entry, not one per category. ONE. I want to taste the best Texas homebrewers have to offer, and we are very much looking forward to taking it with us to GABF later this year!
Paper/Cardstock: CTMH - Colonial White bulk card base; CM - Green cardstock; Reflections - Pink Cardstock
- Government Mule (Jammier side of the Alman brothers). If you like the Alman Brothers and the Grateful Dead you'll love Govt Mule.
The events will run from Monday, 14 to Friday, 18 May 11.00 – 3.00pm and are also open to those without pets who are thinking of getting a dog
Who wants to go to a boring snooze fest of a dinner party and sit around and stare at the other guests, trying to make polite conversation without yawning over dessert? Not the Intrigue Family! We decided to gather up a couple of families with kids and have a casual, kid friendly afternoon and evening at our place. In that regard, we invited a couple of friends over. For the sake of anonymity, how about we call the first family George and Martha Washington, due to their Virginia/D.C. connections? (Yes, I know that D.C. wasn’t the capitol when Washington was POTUS, but it is named after him, so work with me.) The second family, we’ll call The Livingstones since they lived in Africa for a while. We also hosted a friend on leave from attending a school in Pakistan who we’ll call Ed, because…that’s not his name. With a combined half dozen kids, that rounded out the evening’s attendance.
I think it is such a blessing to be able to have more than one child. I understand that some people aren't able too and it breaks my heart for them. I am amazed with myself how I have grown with each of my babies, I am more relaxed, confident and patient (well sometimes, it is hard with Mason and Lily, ha). I am loving this baby stage and I don't want it to end.
THAT'S ALL :)
Hans-Gunter Laimer, a farmer in Lower Bavaria who once ran for election for the NPD and is linked to Umwelt und Aktiv, questions why the left has been allowed to dominate the organic scene for so long. "What is the difference between my cucumbers and those of someone from the Green party?" he said.
This morning started with a rude awakening by Aiko-chan the Alarm Kitty. She started attempting to wake me up around 5 a.m., which is about when I begin my day during the work week. She meowed. She pawed me in the face. I covered my head with my pillow. She continued her assault.
Obtaining plenty fresh water to store at my home that will last about a week (about 30 gallons)
rehearsal processes and opinions, on a variety of subjects.
Ingrid Horrocks
Alright, so maybe ‘hair mask’ is a little deceiving. Perhaps I should just say ‘treatment’ although you do use the coconut as a mask… Okay, editor decision – Coconut Hair Mask Treatment! Ta da!
My youngest son loves animals and has been begging me for the last year for a pet. He in the past has had hermit crabs, fish, hamsters, and a couple of dogs. Currently we have about 200 pigeons and 10 chickens. Do you think these count as pets? Oh no, he wants a "real" pet. I have been saying no but for some reason my husband thought today was a good day to get a fish.
The first chapter of the book discusses three different approaches to anarchism: the canonical, which identifies the founding fathers and key thinkers; the categorical - an approach which groups anarchists into schools (for example "philosophical", "communist", "individualist") - and which spawned a movement that demands ‘anarchism without adjectives’; and the historical, which traces the emergence of the political and labour movements which sprang up across the world in the late nineteenth- and early twentieth-centuries.
By 2008 the American Heart Association reported that ‘heart disease’ kills about 16,000 young women annually and accounts for 40,000 hospitalizations in young women.
Mark, and the rest of INDDF saw them as a rock in their shoe. They weren't after galactic conquest, or embargo deals, or even money. They really just enjoyed scaring as many people as possible just to see the looks on their faces, and they found that putting leaders of planets in danger was the easiest way to do it. In the beginning, INDDF would try and talk Rislings down from their pranks, but found that whenever they did, the Rislings would blow something up, or kill someone just to get a reaction out of the on-lookers, so instead, INDDF officers learned to shoot first and ask questions later. The Risling community didn't even get offended by it, they saw their pranksters being killed as an occupational hazard. "At least they got us a few laughs before being riddled with plasma blasts."
how cruel.
This was taking ages (getting to 40-50 mins on a fast dev machine), which isn’t really sustainable.
‘We’ve been treating Cheryl homeopathically. Our practitioner said it was important to let the fever burn off the infection.’
always … look on the bright side
829 T2 Invented BPC’s. (From Invention)
This was the inaugural running of the Coastal Classic, with a beautiful course through Sydney's Royal National Park, and I'd been looking forward to it for months.
You’ll never feel good about a game you had to win by cheating.
Thanks for stopping by today. Have a fabulous weekend!
Well my mum I think is a bit confused with my sudden love of pastel colours. I think she has the whole "you're a grown up. act like one" attitude to everything i like right now.
An amazing city with a rather nice tram system (I'm pretty keen for anything that isn't busses, don't even get me started on how much I loath them... then again I live in Sydney).
is not yet
ADDITIONAL RESOURCES
Women – will kill that woman.
While still living in Surfers Paradise and processing my divorce, I eventually left my self-created victim behind and started to see that we are all equal … that everyone is both genuis and idiot. Feeling a little more compassionate about myself and others, this song emerged from my mind …
John 5:26, 27: For just as the Father has life in himself, so he has granted also to the Son to have life in himself. And he has given him authority to do judging, because Son of man he is.
The port captain’s office says in a Sunday statement that an inclination of three degrees prompted the Saturday night evacuation. It says no petroleum has leaked from the platform owned by the U.S. firm Transocean, and no one has been hurt and navigation is not affected.
Well turns out yes I did have a gall stone back in Dec and it is still there. But that does not answer why I have lower abdominal pain. It does however answer why I look like I have eaten a basketball.
This is another area I really love, and so do both kids. We take a cultural, daily life perspective, instead of the war-based, building good little patriots one the schools like to use. This area is a lot of fun for us. It's another one that involves a lot of hands-on work, projects, and discovery.
So there has been this thing, where, for some reason, the legislature here in my state has tried to pass several laws recently that have to do with procreation and abortion.
My house (my home ) is sold. My only wish for the new owners is that they find at least half of the happiness and love I had here. That will be enough.
6. I am excited about life again. I feel like I am standing at the beginning of something amazing. Family-wise, church-wise, career-wise. Life is sweet. Incredibly so. I am hearing God's voice more clearly. He is challenging me in ways I don't want to be challenged and yet every time I obey Him, He opens up the next door and pours out His blessings. Sorry non-Christians. You probably think I'm moggy. But it's astounding and I'm grateful and stunned.
She finally sang with the emotion of her blind audition, and, as much as I didn’t want to like it, I couldn’t stop my draw from dropping. So, it was no real surprise when she was voted through to the finals, with a very impressive margin, I might add. Cee Lo split his 100 points 60-40 in her favor, but even that 20 point difference didn’t make a difference. Juliet would have won simply based on the viewers’ votes. As you might know, I really wanted Jamar to win it all this season, so I’m pretty bummed, but, after Juliet’s performance, I can’t really hold it against her…
Monsters and Critics.com
She wore a white ceremonial dress. It was gauze
Lauren Nelson, 20, posed as the teen and logged into chatrooms frequented by men hoping to meet underage girls for sex.
“Millions.. Then what?”
Finally, the olive tree is virtually indestructible. Even if you cut it down at the trunk and “kill it”, the roots begin to sprout new shoots in every direction, bringing new life. What a powerful truth that dove carried in its beak that day – that Jesus Christ would be struck down, but that He would rise again, because at the root of all God’s chosen people is an overall plan of redemption that will not end. The dove delivered an olive branch to signify to Noah that the old was gone, but the new redeemed earth was ready. Consider where Jesus spent the night His last night praying about the plan of redemption set before Him – the garden of Gethsemane, on the Mount of Olives.
And very comfortable.
But surprise, they will not share the couscous plate the same way; the first guest, because they have contributed more to the plate, will now take 48% of the whole
3 – He was not abducted by a stranger. He was (again, allegedly) shot by his mom’s ex-boyfriend.
Must: What made the degradation of the messiah necessary? Scripture, as later spelled out in Mark 9:12; 14:21,49. (France)
naps, food weather temperature and became very concerned
Oddly enough, though my book launch party was successful and broke my previous “view” record, the new record was broken the very next day because someone “stumbleupon”ed one of my older articles. The power of the internet. Need to get me some of that.
for real.Aside from the gifts, candy, money and dates, a lady needs a man to be into her
- most of my discussions ranged around those business numbers – why had they not resulted or why they had. Essentially was trying to put a logic around uncontrollables!
Cyclists will discuss marketing strategies, advertising and promotional ideas with marketing professionals, and learn about Landry’s business and its success in the biking industry.
Austindo Nustantara Jaya Group’s website states its vision is “to become a world-class Sustainable Food and Energy company which elevates the status of the Indonesian People”.
I've had many years to reflect on that ride. It left me with a first-hand experience with, as mentioned, a type of person with whom I might otherwise have never come into contact. Here was Leon Hess, a lion of American business, probably a billionaire, giving me fifteen minutes to form an impression of how someone in his station in life might be. And the impression was quite a favorable one.
Earlier this month, DDOT officials announced the “415 Plan,” an initiative to guarantee riders will catch a bus at stops along its four busiest routes within fifteen minutes, Monday through Friday, from 6am to 6pm. What was not as heavily promoted is the fact that for the most part, service on these routes is already supposed to be operating at or around 15-minutes between buses. As detailed by the chart below, there are some peak and non-peak hours that will see wait time reductions on these routes, but are these small decreases in wait times on these four routes worthy of praise amongst all the increases in wait times on most of the other routes around the city?
Quit Smoking
I've hit a stalemate with some of my sought assistance. I don't believe that there is as much help for me as I initially believed. I am thankful for what is there, but the system was not designed for people like me. I don't even know anyone else like me, so how would they know to prepare for me?
“Hey, you can’t–”
“'Protein'” is just plain wrong, which is what happens when you switch from foods to nutrients," Nestle said. "I suppose USDA didn’t want to call it the meat group because it includes beans, poultry, and fish as well as meat, but the meat industry has worked tirelessly to equate meat with protein and meat producers should love this."
Moebius: How much would you need to have it ready in 6 months?
Sandra H visited, fresh from an overnight break at a hotel I know well. She went with her OH and they got an amazing deal at the really nice hotel in beautiful grounds. Her card is so pretty, a delightful silhouette (crumbs, I managed to spell that right!) of a lady in a bonnet - mostly pale blue but offset so well with splashes of pink and red. Love it Sandra!
“We’re learning a lot about planets that are close to their stars, but that is not the full picture. We also want to know about systems where planets are very far out. By considering near-, far- and mid-range, we can get a complete picture of planet formation,” University of Florida astronomer Aaron Boley told Discovery News.
-They belittle you in front of other people.
The move regarding settlements is not an isolated one. The Israeli government is now challenging the very decisions made by the Israeli Supreme Court, which has been used as a legitimization platform for many illegal settlements that drove Palestinians from their land.
I used Nubar Forest with a layer of Nubar Wildlife as the base, then used painters tape to block out some triangles and then used China Glaze 2030 to fill it in. Lastly to cover the edges I used a black nail art pen swiper.
My bread has gone stale now – so ready for toast, 2 slices of bread (or brick – which describes it a little better!) with Edam and some ham (packet ham – avoiding contamination.) I did really enjoy this and it has filled me up. The gluten-free carb foods do fill me up I wonder if that is because they can be higher in fat to improve the texture? I don’t think my bread will last another day so I have wasted that mix, about 1/3 of a loaf, I might try freezing some next time, but I don’t think I have enough mix left to make another loaf.
RALEIGH, N.C., March 13 /PRNewswire/ -- A self-published book billing itself as "the quintessential handbook for Havanese dog-owners, breeders and fanciers" has won a prestigious national award as the "Best Single Breed Book" of the year and become a surprise bestseller. "The Havanese" by Diane Klumb and editor Joanne Baldwin, DVM, has won the Dog Writers' Association of America Maxwell Award for Best Single Breed Book of 2005. The book's success is all the sweeter since Klumb and Baldwin decided to publish the book themselves, using Lulu.com, because of what Klumb calls "a bad experience" with a traditional publisher. "They wanted to change everything," explains Klumb. "And the great advantage of publishing on Lulu is that we didn't have to deal with someone else's idea of what makes a good dog book."
Moderator: Marco Adria (University of Alberta)
…but I’m afraid I’ve given up tracking all my blogs, articles and media mentions for a while. Obviously, given how long it is since I put an update up here. Here are a couple of recent links, but I don’t have time to catch up with everything that’s happened since then, going back just a week or two.
I can understand why he said what he said. But it is the NFL's responsibility to keep the players safe on the field.
I am extremely grateful for the life I am living. I am grateful for each and every day with "my girls". I miss you like crazy and I hope you are having fun up there. Please take care of the new little ones that are joining you. I know of at least two mommies that have lost their babies just this week. Those first moments, days and weeks are such a struggle but to know that our babies are safe in the arms of Jesus is at least a little bit of a comfort.
You may enter once each day between now and April 30th.
If you think your dough it too wet, you can sprinkle a little extra flour. Likewise, if your dough isn’t moist enough, add a table-spoon of water or another couple of olives.
Illegal Alien-My daughter dressed like this when she was younger and was pissed because only the teachers understood what she was. Jailers outfit, green face with alien antennae.
We stop off at 7-11 for my second cup of tea. Despite the fact that this will make me have to stop for a pee break much sooner than my husband would like, I don’t see how it can be helped because without more tea, I’ll be comatose before we reach New Jersey. As I fill up the biggest paper cup I can get my hands on, I notice that I’m surrounded by a bunch of burly guys – blue collar men that have more callouses on their hands than fingers. I suddenly feel pathetically girlie making tea alongside these guys as they fill their thermoses with coffee.
I used some new stamps I have from Heartfelt Creations. They are stamped, cut out and layered up to make the top flowers pop. The dp is a digi set from the Shabby Princess. I used the Heartfelt Creations matching flower die set to cut out the flowers and added pearls to their centres. Finally some ribbon and a knot.
There was nothing even remotely resembling alternative rock in those days. The closest we saw was The Cult. Inexplicably, the band was as popular as with the football lunkheads as they were with the Goth kids. Their concerts must have been a thing to see with both sparring groups drawn in to the same venue. Think of the efficiency of the beatings!
2 Mile Water Station (several positions)
Make sure he wears a condom
Probably the most recent purchase, bought a mere six hours ago with my friend Alexa! The Body Shop body butters, were the revelation of 2011 for me, and I did sort of go crazy on them last year. And looks like this year will be similar, 27 days into 2012 and I've already bought 400 ml worth of Body butter: Papaya and Candied Cinnamon!
So, my addition to this Saturday’s meal is my version of Parmesan chicken. We all know how to bread things and I’m going to be honest I HATE it! Just because a) it can get messy and b) it seems to take the longest time to do. Probably not really true but, it can feel like it, depending upon how you do your breading. My version cuts that time in less than half! It also helps that as I’ve mentioned before, we have food allergies and intolerances in my house. So, some steps are amended!
With luck winter should be a bit more peaceful on the social front so more can be done around the place, such as finishing the new vege beds. I'd also like to tackle building a furnace and a smoker over winter now that it's fire season again, though that will have to vie with woodchopping in order to keep the place warm, so I'm not holding out too much hope! Doing at least one of the projects would be good!
These are a few of my favorite things…
Currently I have been wearing a printed tee thrown over tights a lot lately .
Question 18 – The most creative thing I’ve ever done is…
Having come fresh from the coalface, here's how written historical sources work: since the mid-twentieth century and the age of mass communication, you can find lots of references to pretty much anything if you know where to look. The biggest problem facing future historians looking at the early 21st century will be too much material relating to any subject, not too little.
Place Herman in a warm place. Next day is Day 1 and you now proceed following instructions below as if you’d been given a friendship cake mixture to grow. Try to stir at least once each day.
The second group was a bunch of journalists who were traveling on the maiden voyage and will later survive the deadly event that bestowed the great Titanic. These would be the people who will relay the story of the wreck, touch the hearts of the public on how the night evolved perhaps minute by minute and walk us through her final moments.
In fact, the three residents of the house were named Matt Zash, Dan Flannery, and Dave Evans.
Sometimes we get so caught up in procrastination that we forget that we have real commitments going on in our lives. Unfortunately, those commitments only ever seem to rear their head just when you need to get work done. Take into consideration future events and move your deadline up accordingly, so that you don’t wind up writing your thesis during your cousin’s wedding.
¼ c. panko bread crumbs
A walk in the garden or park can help us forget our troubles; a bouquet of flowers puts a smile on our face. Quite simply, flowers make us happy. Research proves nature can improve our emotional and physical health.
announced and told the guy, his papers were not found, that he never did his registration during the admission process.
The Yoga Shakti and the Energy of Experience
This is the world she was born into. Temple has known nothing else. Her journey takes her to far-flung places, to people struggling to maintain some semblance of civilization - and to those who have created a new world order.
The current firestorm over the Obamacare mandate that contravenes personal conscience, a pillar of all religions, has ignited a debate over the separation of church and state. The Constitution specifically forbids “the establishment” of a state religion and, by extenstion, forbids the federal government from coming between an individual’s spiritual beliefs and its demands.
The cozy nest of downy sheath.
The second program available is :
He is in, what is arguably the most adorable part of town. Tiny tree lined streets, beautiful houses, small shops, great restaurants. It's the kind of neighborhood that really feels like a neighborhood, which is rare.
So I was challenged to spend some Team Bucks (it’s like Canadian Tire money only it just to purchase TeamBuys through the TeamBuy.ca website) on some of the promotions on their website.
Maybe there’s
1 damn
Then I made my way around, behind the rope and started snapping pics with my phone since I forgot my camera at home (booo!). At least I was able to get a decent spot.
Frank does have an official WTP? myspace up and running, but it's not updated often at all, so what you'll see there is mostly what we call more 'modern' era photos (ie 1990 and beyond) but still worth visiting to round out the experience! Who knows? One day we might just be able to make the live gigs we have in storage digital and share those down the road - something that would be extremely rare to hear indeed, along with the latter out of print material which we have yet to even hear ourselves.
Music journos nowadays are quick to drop the word ‘fierce‘ whenever a female shows off even the slightest artistic quirk, but the reality is half of them aren’t really worth the compliment. ‘Fierce‘ performers should be strong, passionate individuals, that have the talent and raw energy to pull off wearing spell-binding costumes whilst dancing without them becoming a gimmick. Ladies & gentlemen, today I introduce to you one of the best-kept secrets of the pop world (although this is surely not to be the case soon enough), Vela, who’s undeniably as ‘fierce‘ as they come.
Roscoe's Stout Summit is coming up on Friday Feb 25th at 5PM. If you
It was an easy week. I have been dealing with a lot of pain this week. So, we took it easy most of the week and skipped a whole day. We are waiting until next week to start the new topic for History. We will start the new topic for Science either next week or the week after. Spanish and Computer Programming are his choices, and he does not have to do them. He will have to do Spanish in a few years, but he chose to do it now. I'm not sure that he'll be continuing with either of those in 3rd grade. He has always been fairly sporadic about doing them.
Rockin' Rave DJ Dance Party
1. Lay the scarf on a flat surface, the wrong side facing up.
Soup
TWO: We are going to visit Abbi and Kell I and Alec and Kyra and Tim. There is no other option. It's my way, or...well....your way. But this should be your way. Cause it would make me happy.
FOUR DAYS of hearing our generator run outside our door.
The “understakers” are destroying the BNP from within as they did the NF. Their latest rouse is supporting IRA murderers. Harrington was once photographed by a Belfast memorial to the IRA! Recently, Kevin Scott of Civil Liberty, wrote defending IRA murderer Gerry McGeough. This got newspaper coverage in Sunday World and further turned people against the cause. (5)
Erm, can it? This article is clearly a pile of PR hogwash, but it sure made me chuckle, as well as the Dulux advert on TV at the minute.
Oh just give me my iPhone Sarah, exclaimed Miss 'Petra.
Well anyway on to the original post....
But still my life cries: 'Work and save.
I DO understand that "in the moment" questions about things that make zero sense to someone are kinda exceptions... but I've been noticing over the past year or so that not too many (read: not enough) people take the time to try to figure out things for themselves. Seems people are quick to ask how/why/when/where without bothering to think the answers are super easy to find. Hi Google! I ♥ you!
through iridescent softness
One of those places was the Mark Twain House. In the past we drove by it and stopped and wandered the grounds, but since we had our dog we couldn’t tour the actual house. This past weekend the pooch stayed in Boston and so we were welcome on the tour.
The other night I was pouting/whining about how everyone in my pregnancy group (all due around the same time as me) is talking about how Amazing and Magical it is to feel their babies moving around, when I’m stuck with this dumb anterior placenta and can’t feel a damn thing. The Lumberjack replied “yeah, well, none of them have ninja babies who can flip the placenta to mask their activity!”
Honestly, the first thing that struck me at this stop was the beautiful log home. And the dark slate everywhere. The slate was used for the house, the paths and the walls, and provided a nice dark background for all the color. You could really tell that this is an older garden. Plants have really made their own way. Very natural and unmanicured, peaceful and wandering. There are Forget-Me-Nots woven amongst most everything and they really added a nice, whimsical Alaskan touch. I got the sense of a "tamed" meadow.
d.a. garabedian
About those geoducks (pronounced "goo-eee"), I have never tried them, but then like Letizia, I enjoy salmon better. I don't like shellfish; I heard they are not good for you---too much cholesterol, and at certain times of the year they can be poisonous.
He lets her cry it all out. Mi Roo looks up and apologizes. She doesn’t know why she’s crying. He tells her it’s okay but he’s got one small question. He didn’t quite understand what she was talking about before so could she explain it again but more logically. Ooops, I guess Mr. Aloof Writer was a robot all along. It just causes Mi Roo to cry all over again and Joon is left helpless.
I love my kiddo so much--it's insane. I love his laugh. I love his cry (really--I do!). I love his crawl. I love all the cute little sounds he makes and his crazy-baby outbursts. I love his odd sense of humor. I love the way he head-butts people (softly) to show affection. I love it when he dances/bounces to music. I love everything about him.
Though several pieces from this season's collection have caught my eye, it's the jewelry that has really captured my attention. Many of the pieces are nature inspired and made from mixed metals, which makes them practical for daily wear.
But with your mind
Other than working on it, creative juice also plays a large part in writing. And mind you, it is not a 24/7 thing. It does not appear anytime or in a snap of a finger. Sometimes you have it, sometimes you don’t. Sometimes it appears fleetingly that I immediately have to put it on ink or it’s gone forever. Or sometimes it’s plainly non-existent no matter how I squeeze it out. And my brain just stares at the blank page like, “Sorry bitch, writer’s block -___- …”
Overall, Elisabeth and I had a good meal.. and in terms of distance from the Grand Hyatt, we shall just leave that aside for now. More of San Francisco to come.. so don't despair, it has not yet ended.. Have a good weekend ahead everyone!!
On the 21st April, I turned 30. Having strung the celebrations out for as long as possible, last weekend some very special ladies hit London for a final do! One of them, the lovely Louise Fisher (AKA Twinks) is a champion baker. Between us we made about 70 cupcakes and hers blew mine out of the water with this recipe. I hope she doesn’t mind me recreating it here! The best chocolate cupcake recipe I’ve ever eaten. They can be baked and frozen for another time too.
Don’t let anything get in between us.
In art, they have worked with watercolors (blending colors), worked with creating texture with paint and worked with various materials like oil pastels and chalk pastels.
Why approve of Cheng’s asylum petition and not Wang? Obviously, you have two well-known Chinese people, one of whom has an extensive record of violating human rights, and another who was upholding human rights of those terrorized by local officials in Linyi province carrying out an extreme version of the one-child family policy. Cheng is an internationally known human rights activist, who has been under house arrest in his home village for years. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton told the Chinese Foreign Minister Yang Jiechi in 10 November 2011 at the Asia-Pacific summit that “When we see reports of lawyers, artists and others who are detained or ‘disappeared,’ the United States speaks up both publicly and privately.” She mentioned specifically the case of Chen Guangcheng, and called upon China “to embrace a different path”.
ANYTHING. From RachelVincent.com
“First, we must treat with care and love all material, included.
Another factor that I'm sure is in place making it difficult to find out certain things is because no-one involved will talk about it. They don't want anyone meddling. ESL has a lot of municipalities and a lot of people in politics and everyone is interconnected and they cover each others butts, I'm sure that the old 'conspiracy of silence' thing is going on here. The politics of ESL have been compared to Mayor Daley's machine if that tells you anything.
Appearance: This crystal clear, bright amber brew is well carbonated. The head is a thin layer of tiny bubbles that forma loosely knit head that leaves a trace of lace on the side of the glass.
The politicians that created a legislative structure that penalises innocent patients because of administrative mistakes smacks of political duplicity, the inability to formulate the means to protect
Repeat: Daily for both locations.
Three weeks from today I'm going to be on a beach in Mexico at a lovely resort, with the Saint.
CD 10: Arrive in Denver
Other good times at recess were had when we would try to find rocks under the Big Monkey Bars that still had blood on them from the kid that failed at the Spiderman Jump. Ah, shoot. You don’t know what the Spiderman jump is, either. That was when you would stand on the highest chin-up bar and leap about three miles (well, OK- would you believe twelve feet?) through thin air and grab onto the large diameter pipe of the monkey bar. I tried it once. It scared me silly. It was during summer vacation and I was on a long bike ride by myself that wound up at the school playground, so nobody was around. The first two attempts allowed me to judge just how hard to leap. The third attempt I gave it all I had. I was shocked as my hands struck the cold bar and my fingers wrapped around it. The momentum of the leap swung my body perpendicular to the horizon as I clutched at the bar for dear life. In my mind’s eye I saw images of my head bouncing off the ground and trickling blood from my unconscious noggin staining the white gravel, to be found days later by my underclassmen. Slowly, my body swung back vertical, and I quickly dropped to my feet. It was a good thing I had chalked up in the dusty gravel. Watching summer Olympics had paid off. I shakily climbed onto my bike and weakly rode home.
Later a small dog named Tamale stands beside my leg as I sit on a park bench. It was like he just wanted to be near me, for a moment, and then he was on his way.
Jardin Frédéric Dard
Got The Jitters, Don Redman and His Orchestra
This is an adaptation of those potatoes, but, trust me - some of you know me well enough by now - these are the best pureed - not mashed - potatoes you will ever eat.
Östra Sallerup, SWEDEN
It's home, or as much home as I can claim anywhere, and the land is the sort of thing dreams are made of. For one thing, it's actually possible to get away from the rest of the human race if one is so inclined.
Condition: Brand New – 10/10
“Almighty and most merciful Father . . .”
K: I loved that about it. It does that sort of “I’m gonna have a conversation about music and then I’m gonna have a conversation about faith and then I’m gonna have a conversation about family,” and all those things are linked, all those things make sense as part of a larger conversation.
Brian Caton (Trade Unionist and Socialist Coalition) 125
The Hays County Jail’s Moveable Jail Cell in San Marcos is one of nine sites that a statewide preservation group has named to its ninth annual list of Texas’ Most Endangered Historic Places.
Here is Schumer’s breakdown of local brewing businesses and their production levels by region:
The UK articles are written by HHJ Simon Brown QC and Senior Master Whitaker who, apart from Lord Justice Jackson, are the two judges best able to cover this ground (that is not saying that they are the only ones who are competent to adjudicate on eDisclosure and case management issues, but only they articulate views for the guidance of court users).
Combine all marinade ingredients in a small bowl. Place chicken in a ziploc bag and pour the marinade ingredients over the top. Seal the bag and place in the refrigerator and let marinate for 2-3 hours.
General characteristics
Peace…
I came across croissant for the first time in Japan, and fell in love with them. I had not seen croissant in India, while I was there. I had read that French croissant is out of the world, but never any chance to taste them. If I get to visit that dream country, for sure I am going for it. After researching several write ups and blog post, and even a black and white Julia child’s You Tube video I made this. They taste really good, but I still need more practice to get the exact shaping of it. It gets better and better while doing it.
I was hoping for some progress in California, but they apparently prefer to continue their slide into the abyss. And Washington being Washington, we will have to wait and wait for the final count on the Murray/Rossi race. Washington is a very blue state: King County vs. the rest of the state.
Own your truth and your state of grace, right here and right now! (But know that you will be tested by your universe.)
Believe me, I have tried. I have added 2 more inches of fringing to this necklace, and if you click on the above pic to enlarge it, and then look at the portion of the necklace that is between the 2 bead mats, where the wooden bench is the background - this is the part I have been working on. For about 2 weeks.
You will, therefore, permit me to repeat emphatically that old Waterstone's is as dead as a doornail.
*He is wearing 6-12 month and 12-18 month clothes. For some reason, he's getting tall. His momma and daddy don't have that gene.
I found my interest waning in Brandling's story with each successive page I'm afraid but Carey's portrait of a grieving lover is far more engaging. Catherine medicates herself with alcohol and sedatives, stumbles into work where rather than commit fully to the restoration she trawls through her old email exchanges, lost in remembrance. She is even assigned a young assistant cum spy to keep an eye on her, an 'overenthusiastic' young student who is the counterpoint to Catherine's technophobe. Often hooked up to her 'frankenpod' and glued to web images of the Gulf of Mexico oil spill as it unfurls live, it is she who cannot bear to watch Catherine mooning over her inbox and downloads all the messages to a USB stick for her to take away. Catherine meanwhile becomes immersed in the notebooks, the slow reconstruction of the intricate machine, and the deconstruction of her own life to its most basic elements, so that she too becomes almost machine-like, echoing de Vaucanson’s duck once again as she struggles to keep herself together near the novel's conclusion - 'Ingest, I thought, digest, excrete repeat.'
I get a phone call from afar. It is my husband in Afghanistan calling to wish our boy a Happy Birthday. I beam and hide my tears. My son smiles big and laughs and then says I love you DAD! The life of a military child, accepting a call from the man he knows as dad and loves without conditions.... knowing Dad is celebrating with him even if he is not "with" him. It is at that moment today that I hug my child knowing he has grown with grace, honor and courage and is no longer my little boy but a young man. A young man accepting what life brings and smiling his bright big Sammy smile.
The ICC has failed to carry out justice, the prosecutors should be fucking ashamed of themselves.
I love adding stamps to the journal cards that are in the
Far from being more liberal or more democratic than the Saudi Government; they were less so. Or, more accurately, they wanted a situation of increased, not decreased, Islamisation. As examples of that increased Islamisation, they wanted complete interest-free banking, a conscript army (so as not to rely on the US in any future conflicts), a rejection of the Israeli-Arab peace process, increased friendship with Islamist regimes (such as the Algerian one at the time), more hudub (amputations for theft, etc.) etc.
UV treated sun visor
Well done ladies!
(55) A somewhat simplified form of classical Greek know as “Koine” became the lingua franca of this empire and remained so even after the Roman conquests, especially in its eastern regions.
The problem was that my photos were mostly of the Moon when it was waxing – between new moon and full moon. The reason for this is because when the Moon is waxing, it always rises before sunset. Actually, the full moon always rises at sunset. I would sometimes get photos of the slightly post-full moon but I never got photos of the last quarter moon and waning crescent moon because they always rose after midnight. (Waning is when the Moon is between being Full and New.)
I had som black/white houndstooth fabric, which is quite nice 'cause you won't see if you are not that accurate when sewing.
So we get home, get to bed about 3.30am. 5 am my daughter wakes up screaming. She wouldn’t calm down. In the end, my wife took her downstairs to play. I tried to follow, but my wife insisted I stay in bed as I had work and she didn’t.
Brattleboro has an edge to it, a hipster-enviro-stick it to the man, kind of vibe. What kind of happening place, like that, doesn't have a food co-op? I expected the Brattleboro Food Cooperative to have beer, but not the beer they had. They had the big, 22 oz bombers of McNeil's—in all their flavors, and I grabbed a bottle of Champ Ale and one of their Oatmeal Stout. But, of course they're going to have McNeil's, they're the home town brew. They also had an amazing selection of, not only Vermont craft beer, but craft beer from all over the country—everything from North Coast's Old Rasputin to, just about everything, Berkshire Brewing Company makes. I grabbed a six of Founders Dirty Bastard Scotch Ale and Green Flash West Coast IPA (both unavailable in New York) to go along with the McNeil's, and out the door we went.
past all the suns
I picked up my shovel and I walked to the mine
My biggest issue with this book is that Rory never got a swift kick in the balls. Emotionally or physically. He got off the hook too easily. All was forgiven without too much hassle. Almost like his mere presence was enough to soothe his past wrongs. As a reader it wasn’t enough for me. Apparently I’ve got more chutzpah than our beloved Erin O’Brien.
Retort will host an event on the closing day of the installation. On Sunday, April 4th between 2 and 5 o’clock, at the round table in front of the tapestry copy of Guernica (referencing Calder’s Mercury Fountain in the 1937 Spanish Pavilion), there will be a recorded discussion on the topic of terror against civilians as an instrument of modern statecraft and the failed efforts of popular movements to halt it. The conversation – between an invited panel and then opening to all in attendance – will be primed by a brief presentation, in front of the tapestry, of Retort’s case in Afflicted Powers that terror from the air is constitutive of modernity, and T.J. Clark’s argument in Picasso and Truth that Guernica registers a double mourning, for the Spanish republic in its death throes but also for an end to modern humanity’s hopes of a true space of belonging. In the light of this history – from Guernica to Gaza – what are the possibilities of renewal for an anti-war movement? If it was hard in 1937, how might “art against war” be conceived under contemporary conditions of spectacle and the new arsenal of image machines?
Just as important to me is the packaging issue. It drives me nuts to see all my food wrapped in plastic. Plastic that will just end up in garbage island one day (see http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Great_Pacific_Garbage_Patch)... The worst is the supermarket meat, with its Styrofoam tray, plastic wrap and most repulsive absorbent pad that lines the tray. The meat I buy from my neighbor - or the meat you can buy at your farmer's market - is neatly wrapped in a brown wax paper, which will rapidly biodegrade in one way or another. Styrofoam egg trays? Foods wrapped in plastic, then plastic again and again? Would you like a plastic bag with that?
Pages: 256
It happened today. The very last child to go. Mother came to give me a hug and I could see that she was struggling, trying to hold back the tears. Her three children have all been with us for the last six years. Ever since we opened the pre-school. We hugged. And I was lost. Tears that had been threatening all morning finally came and I had to wave goodbye to Mother and Child with great big fat tear-drops dripping off my face, while twisting face into the biggest smile I could muster. Not the greatest look in the world.
Padungtod C, Savitz DA, Overstreet JW, Christiani DC, Ryan LM, Xu X. Occupational pesticide exposure and semen quality among Chinese workers. J Occup Environ Med 2000; 42: 982-992.
From a fitness standpoint, I in the best overall shape of my life...at almost 36 years old. I nearly tripled the number of pushups I could do at the beginning. I went from being unable to do a pullup to being able to do sets of 8, partially healing a bum shoulder in the process.
When Paschal light breaks through the fog,
Boden Breton stripe top, in mint, £25. Or candy pink, or lilac, the fun colours. Jaunty in navy, too, but the ice-cream shades promise more hijinks.
A tough decision confronted her: to walk or to take a taxi. The bus would probably make her sick and she didn’t know the subway system very well. She decided to start walking and let her fatigue make up her mind for her.
Telling me that you were going to die without me
I inhale the fresh air
Prep. time: 7 minutes
Kenneth Kasten, 50, owner of the Sanibel Shell service station, was driving the Porsche on McGregor Boulevard near Punta Rassa Road at 6 a.m. when he lost control and flipped the car into some mangroves, according to the Florida Highway Patrol.
I, like many others, am currently obsessed with Lori Hutchinson, aka The Caketress. I am seeing works inspired by her designs all over the Internet. The more I see, the more I like her work.
Hope I can get back in the groove of writing and posting. Got lots of pictures and will be going back and forth with posts.
I like to imagine that Scott and I are walking in the woods at the exact same time, and then comparing notes here on the blogosphere. The truth is, he’s wandering along Little Crum Creek in southeastern Pennsylvania and I’m in the woods of southern Connecticut. I still feel like we’re neighbors – but nature has a way of making connections like that! You have to see some of his amazing up-close-and-personal photos!
1)Refunds: If your airfare drops, check into getting a refund. There are different fees and policies for ticket refunds depending on the airline. Alaska, JetBlue and Southwest Airlines all will offer refunds if the price of their airfare drops. A few of the airlines charge change fees so the refund may not be worth it in the long run but its worth checking out.
Here's what we analyzed with Adam: Studium vs. punctum. (Don't ask.) Chyeck. Making the torture and killing of bulls (and the goring and subsequent PTSD of the bullfighter) interesting. Check. Poignancy: A courageous wimp loses in a street fight against a bully butcher and his publican and chimney sweep pals. And colorful imagery: "...the butcher lights ten thousand candles out of my left eyebrow." Check. Experimental writing: Retelling a Greek myth using characters who wear flip-flops and outrageous dialogue such as, "Greek, cut that bitch." Check. Showing a husband's devotion through the procurement and grilling of a slippery kidney. Check. More dialogue: Dignifying the t in shit. Self-flagellating would-be poet who sees the writing of poetry as a condition requiring fits. The strength of a parson's rhetoric (stronger, it seems, than his arms) in calming the wrath of an unforgiving squire. How many pupils can say, one at a time, "Good morning, sir." before a teacher named Paul says "Oh, shut up." (Three.) How, if you put the character's name in bold caps above their dialogue, you don't have to use quotation marks or "He said, adoringly." Check, check checkity check. Sentences: Long ones. Short ones. And meaningless ones like this: "A shining breakfast, a breakfast shining, no dispute, no practice, nothing, nothing at all." (Note to my formerly famous former writer boyfriend: the use of commas does fuck-all for this sentence.) Chee-yeck! Then a very long poem that we had to read five times but still couldn't figure out why there was a fucking haystack in there at all. (I've run completely out of checks.)
Well, there were a lot of ducks running around. They LOVED chasing the ducks around and trying to catch them. I caught a few seconds on video. I also caught a little 4 year old boy quacking...
far as WRITER’S BLOCK goes, I haven’t really experienced it…yet. Sure, there are times when I’m taking longer to work out a scene, moving people in and around a room, a ship’s deck, or a hotel’s basement, but I have secrets I use. First, I have a large white board where I draw out the scene and characters, moving them about as modified stick figures, visible from an overhead view—which happens to be just like a crime scene sketch. This way I don’t lose bodies in dynamic fight scenes, and I can get into the little boy mode of playing with toy soldiers, which is something else I’ve done. Other tricks include taking a shower and letting the hot water roll over me. There’s something about the tactile touching that activates the alpha state, where I’m most creative. If that still doesn’t work, I sit down in a chair and do a formal mediation, which is something I learned how to do many years ago. Once I can calm down and relax, the characters can go to work and tell me where the story should go. And a funny little side to this alpha state thing is that I have woken up in the middle of the night only to find the characters ready to play. Rather than fight it, I climbed out of bed, booted up the computer, and wrote it all down. You cannot wait for morning when this happens, because if you let yourself go back to sleep, you will have a dickens’ of a time
We're still discovering what gluten-free products we love and loathe, so the pantry is looking pretty bare. Plus, my gluten-free flours have yet to arrive from Amazon.com (woo! hoo! for the free shipping that comes with prime membership). I've been supplementing Squirt's diet with processed gluten-free products like Glutino breakfast bars while I start figuring out how to make more wholesome foods. But all in all, the pantry is looking pretty darn bare at the moment.
‘Now that is a pathetic excuse for a dog,’ Tim laughed. ‘He’ll have to carry it before long.’
Uncomfortably, I remember traipsing around carrying a violin case and sheet music as a youngster, feeling slightly trapped by my own inability to make the music sound perfect (the way it does on records). Perhaps when you lose the sheet music you get in touch with something more important? Joy? I did enjoy playing but found a lot of the trappings - music stands you could catch your fingers in, orchestra rehearsals at the same time every week, the drone of the tuning up - slightly oppressive.
Lemonade is the perfect refreshing summertime drink.
So you know how I mentioned here that although this blog may be newer, I am not new to blogging and I've been working on putting together our family blog books. I've been blogging for family and friends since we had our first kid, Ruby, and it's just kept going since then and now we have Archer. I've kept these blogs private for quite a while now as there's just a ton of pictures of my kids on there and it is one of those my-kids-are-the-cutest,-most-perfect-in-the-whole-world blogs so unless you're a really good friend, an aunt or a grandparent, I'm sure you don't want to read it.
-composition book grey
Express Your Cultural Heritage. Whether it is a full body burkas that only exposes your beautiful eyes, a brightly colored kente cloth mu-mu, fashionable lederhosen, or a revealing silk kimono, don’t be afraid wear your heritage and watch your career take off! No matter what culture you are from, dress for success with the traditional clothes of your ancestors. This will prove to your boss that although you are forward thinking, you are firmly rooted in your cultural history, and this will certainly help you jockey into position for the next promotion!
“I did not mean that,” said Pierre. “And I think you know it.”
I wanted to use some Barbara Brackman reproduction fabric I had received for Mother’s Day and included some solid pieces to make up the blocks.
Note: All the meats have roughly the same calories; if you feel like steak or pork, they’re no worse than the chicken.
Hachi: That’s awsome.
So across this cobblestone street was the Palace. It was hard to even get the whole thing into a photo. Heidi told us that the Queen was in the Palace the day we were there. They fly a flag so people know. I didn't get a picture of the flag.
Before I go any further, I have more news :o(
On December 13, 2011… I had a miscarriage.
You have to have a dud recipe every now and then, right?
It's Bengt,
4 times Matt gave me the "what are those dance moves?" look...
1) Email Laura@OutlawCrossFit.com
Former Brazilian president Fernando Henrique Cardoso recommended President Dilma Rousseff a purge of her cabinet which faces yet another alleged corruption case: the minister of Labour, the fifth since she took office last January.
Think I will try using red and green on the foil and see how that turns out!
- Park next to cart return bins at stores.* If your child is still in an infant seat, it lets you put the seat in a cart immediately and wheel it into the store, and allows you to return the cart after shopping without leaving your child at all. If your child is in a convertible seat and rides in the cart, you can put your child in the cart immediately and not have to worry about the danger of them bolting in a parking lot.
Teresa Kay-Aba Kennedy – “Dr. Terri K.”
Samual Adams - Cranberry Lambic
07 House of the Rising Sun
In an interview with ParentDish, Chua described the difference between the Chinese way of parenting and a Western approach is that, “…Western parents worry much more about their children’s self-esteem whereas Chinese parents don’t. They assume strength rather than fragility, and because of that that they behave very differently. A lot of the techniques and things they say seem very harsh to Westerners.”
We hit the fabric store again, and she found a pattern that alleged to be "very easy", but required darts and gathers. I began to hyperventilate at the idea of sewing darts and gathers when I had a 24 hour timeline. She saw the panic on my face and decided we should skip it.
Tonight, I explained to my church small group one of the reasons I wouldn't let my girls read my current work-in-progress: Language. It's a young adult book, mind you, and as those go, it's not too scandalous. But it's a first draft, and although I'm hoping to replace the bad language during the revision process, I refuse to censor it now. Here's why:
So my man came home from a long day at work and a fun little surprise was awaiting him. He always comes in our side door which opens to a little nook table in the kitchen. On top of the table was a lit candle, a large paper, as pictured above, with the numbers 1,2,3,4 and a positive pregnancy test pointing to the #4. As soon as he opened the door the kids and I were standing near the table yelling surprise! We had the house decorated like a party, streamers, balloons, and signs that read...
I am finally lifting my head after three weeks of burying it and trudging through. Nose to the grindstone. For awhile, I felt like I was drowning, but now I am steadily treading water. I made it through the first three weeks!! YAHOO!! I feel so incredible to have made it to this point.
It is frustrating that the public take this generic view based on one race each year, but the industry must deal with it.
Website Maintenance and Development
I am sure that you all are aware that Digital Ink closed this week. Long story not wanting to post it all over the net. I wish Judy the best of luck and say thank you for taking a chance on me.
Noah and I will be traveling to Tennessee on Friday to hang out with my family and help roast my step dad at his retirement party. The flight will be eventful I am sure, considering Noah wants to walk around all the time. I’m bribing him with a new shiny toy and plenty of snacks to hopefully keep him happy and occupied for the flight.
My husband and I attended an Appleseed weekend while the kids visited cousins for a week in Chicago. Then, we all traveled onto Minneapolis where we celebrated a 6 year old birthday, reminisced with high school friends, hugged family, watched my nephew play baseball, rode a Ferris wheel, had a water fight, ate lots of food, enjoyed blue skies with puffy white clouds.
Karl Henri Joseph, 25, New York, N.Y.
So it is something
Dragged these five men to Death with gun and suord,
I found other interests as my daughter grew and I had 2 more babies. Interests you say? Larry answers, interest is not passion. "You come to me and say, "I have an interest.""
Just because you are there, it doesn’t mean I’ll be there, but I would be.
I will be back later with sneak peeks from some fab stamps and a really great cd. So I hope you can come back and see.
The range of pintxos available is bewildering at first, and we stand slack-jawed at the counter trying to decide which ones to choose. Each dish is clearly labelled, including vegetarian and vegan options, and tongs are provided for hygiene.
Why Blow of a wind that slowly tells me
Kakuro
Facts are, however, where we have to start. Fact: I was sexually abused. Fact: My father did it. Fact: My mother knew and did nothing to stop it. Fact: I was now royally screwed up because of it.
I am new to this honor…and to blogging so please bear with me…I hope I do this right!
A woman dumps you, you go to a bar and get drunk. Someone cuts you up on the freeway, you shout ‘Asshole!’ and give him the finger. A werewolf appears, you scream like a six-year-old girl. These are the scripts. In any case he not only went maaah! in falsetto but flung both arms up in the region of his head. The remote flew from his hand and sailed across the room to clatter against a chair, leaving America’s Next Top Model to keep us company for the duration. Perhaps by profound survival instinct he held onto his cell phone. I reached out, relieved him of it, and while he watched crushed it in my own ample monster mitt, with spectacle elicited from him a strange nasal sound. His face crumpled or crimped as in preparation for grown-man toddler tears, but from the distension of his mouth and his filling lungs I knew another bigger scream was coming. I thought, We can’t have that.
What I did come away with and what made the con worthwhile for me was validation that what I’m doing is on the high curve of where the self-pubbing industry is at today. We’re not setting any records (yet!), but we’re also well ahead of where most indies and indie-wannabes are at right now.
Stir and ladle into bowls.
Those oversized sweaters reaching your thighs you threw away, are suddenly trendy once again. Match these sweaters with colored leggings and lengthy dangly chains. Baggy short sweaters look shoddy and frumpy. Semi-transparent leggings gives a sexier look to the whole attire, but be careful with the length of the sweater.
Of course it had to happen. After my glowing “man-crush” about Josh Hamilton, it was only a matter of time before his inevitable injury occurred – and it did! If Josh Hamilton didn’t have bad luck, he’d have no luck all. Thankfully, it just appeared to be be somewhat of a precautionary move to avoid agitating symptoms, but this just doesn’t give you the sense of comfort that it should considering his left groin and such injuries can linger throughout the season.
"Children should only use a 'pea-sized' portion of fluoride toothpaste when they brush."
I also used one of the same chargers that I have on the breakfast table and a set of matching coasters. Kind of gives the room a tropical look with the rush seats of the benches showing through the glass top of the table.
I was actually inspired by myself and a card I made earier. I love love
"What are we doing in our daily lives to remember 9/11? Taking life for granted? Or soaking in every precious moment, telling family and friends we love them, and setting our priorities straight? Let's make this day more than about remembering where we were then - let's take a good look at where we are now."
At that point I’ll be down to 1 product a day, and at about 1200 calories.
Here they are
Another thing that we need to realise is the extent to which the Academic Journal Racket is feeding off the monster that is Research Assessment, specifically the upcoming Research Excellence Framework. The main beneficiaries of such exercises are not the researchers, but the academic publishers who rake in the profits generated by the mountains of papers submitted to them in the hope that they’ll be judged “internationally leading” (whatever that means). If the government is serious about Open Access then only papers that are freely available should be accepted by the REF. If that doesn’t shake up the system, nothing will!
Finishing the Dish
Clean eggs and put away
message tonight instead of tomorrow. I know that everyone is busy over
J Dilla. Jay Dee. James Yancey. One man, many aliases. But no matter how you chose to address him, there was no debating his genius. From his solo material, to his work with Slum Village and later the backbone of the Soulquarians collective; J Dilla’s contributions to music are priceless. His unique sound is still felt and oft-imitated six years after his death.
This was an excellent example of how you don’t have to shell out money upfront for something to be a vanity press. Anyone could send a poem in to the International Library of Poetry, and not only receive an acceptance letter but also be a semi-finalist.
Christopher Fowler – The Spider Kiss
Preparing for the birth of our third baby, I had been attending prenatal yoga classes, where I had heard the mention of a blessingway as an alternative to a modern baby shower. With this being our final baby, I felt the time was right for a celebration of motherhood and birth. I invited my closest women for a simple gathering, a week before the baby was due to be born. I decorated a wall with photos that captured motherhood for me.
is primordial flash.
Like all Greenies, a lot of Toepfer's thinking was irrational. His beloved Lueneburger Heide (Luneburg Heath) is not a natural landscape at all. It was originally forest-covered but the trees were cut down and the area is maintained mainly as a grassland by grazing sheep on it. It is an environment heavily altered by human intervention! And present day German Greenies regard the Lueneburger Heide as sacred ground too. You can't make this stuff up
Erica blew my mind totally out of the water this month with her Daring Bakers Challenge to us. First I saw "baklava." Cool! I can do that! Been doing that for years! I get a break this month--woot! Then I saw "make your own phyllo." Surely she jests?
A great way to start recording local bands and on the day I got some of the cream of Brisbane's bands at the time.
“Remember that old song from the Who? ‘See Me, Feel Me, Touch Me’ was it?” he asks. “That was a good song.”
The Beastie Boys are one of the most important and influential hip-hop groups of all time. They were instrumental in making hip-hop a global, mainstream force. Formed in 1981 as a hardcore band, they combined punk and rap into a singular sound that grew increasingly broad over the years, encompassing a vast array of genres. Yauch, Michael Diamond (Mike D), and Adam Horowitz (Ad-Rock) released several classic albums, including their debut album Licensed to Ill in 1986, 1989's Paul's Boutique, and 1994's Ill Communication.
Then the Lord spoke to me in my spirit and said, “Sometimes people cry and whine because it’s the only language they have.”
Following Operation Cast Lead, the Palestinians claimed the IDF used white phosphorous during offensives in Gaza, however the army denied the claims. The Palestinians have reportedly fired shells containing the dangerous substance several times in the past.
In the end, “Are you better off in 2012 than you were four years ago?” will end Obama’s first and last term.
Anyway, Norman chugs along, as.per usual. I think I may have to get someone to check the chain soon, I'm pretty sure they stretch quite a lot in the first little while after they're new so I'll get the tension checked out once we've done another 1000kms or so. Anywho, a quick bonus of bridget at the pink lakes from the other day too, and what also bridget posing next to a lovely fj holden ute at the motor museum, what a sight! I think she has to work on her draped across the bonnet pose a little more.
Bake the meatloaf, uncovered, for 40 to 50 minutes, depending on size/thickness. It could take up to an hour if it's baked in a high sided loaf pan. About half way through the cooking process, I remove it from the oven, pour on the glaze and spread it evenly over the top.
Actually, this riddle is designed to be nonsensical, and according to its author, Lewis Carroll, he never intended for there to be any real answer to the question: “Why is a raven like a writing desk?” The entire point of the riddle is that it has no answer, although numerous people have come up with creative interpretations of the riddle.
Hosted by: Webster’s Community Pharmacy, Fine Stationers and Liquor Store
We decided to go the Harajuku district which is known for its funky and hip fashion. We were sooo hungry that we decided to get lunch right away. I spotted a lunch special at a pizza place and for 10 USD we each got iced coffee, Caesar salad and pepperoni pizza. It was really yummy!
One of my co-workers was sick and I convinced her to go home since we were so slow. Then I read most of a Calvin and Hobbes book. Time crawled on.
MH: In keeping with the name of this blog what is your favorite type of hat? (or just favorite hat if you have one)
I mean, look at this baby face!
1/2 pound linguine
Level 42 Lessons in love UK
I smiled. “It’s a good thing the world’s round,” I said.” -Starclimber, Kenneth Oppel
Why this constant need to differentiate?
seduces us with his boldness and energy and repels us with his willingness to place us
Going into Debt
that in doing so, no claim limitation was eliminated.
I've tried some of the other types of ATCs, vellum and watercolor most notably, but didn't like their textures or how the ink went down quite as well for a reference card. I do use the other materials in actual projects, but not for my pattern collection.
A comment on brokenness, now.
Btw, Roger Daltry has to be the greatest rock singer if for no other reason than the fact that he sang not one but two demented but excellent rock operas written by his eccentric but talented guitarist Pete Townsend.
Improving children’s brain functioning through specific exercise movements.
The challenge will run from now until midnight GMT on 6 November 2011. Leave a link to your card (not just your blog) in the link list below. If it's not there for some reason, leave a comment and I'll add your link in before the draw. Good luck.
Therefore, this picture was taken at the very end of the night.
09/05/2011 SELL 0.01 usdcad 0.99248 09/07/2011 0.98629 +6.30
But in my view that doesn't cut any ice.
Make the red pepper layer: Heat the oil in a large sauté pan over medium-high heat. Add the peppers, garlic, onion, and rosemary. Season with salt and pepper to taste. Cook, stirring often, until the peppers and onions are well softened, 7 to 10 minutes. Don't let them brown; add more oil if the pan is dry. Let cool.
Have a good Sunday.
Brown needs to have the courage to stand on this popular discontent over assets and the huge resentment that the NACTs are taking over Auckland in an anti-democratic coup.
Blogging from an iPhone has it's limits!
If I see someone crossing the road in front of me and I speed up, hoping to give them a scare that they’re about to be run over when crossing where they shouldn’t be.
‘Lolita, light of my life, fire of my loins. My sin, my soul.’
A photographer is searching for a woman he caught on camera nearly forty years ago.
Then another soldier goes out and shoots 16 Afghan civilians, including nine children and the Taliban plans 'deadly attacks' as revenge takes over..
their rock
We're both of us beneath our love, we're both of us above
This isn’t a popularity contest – there is no “voting”. ActionAid will judge all nominations on the quality of their comments and support they get from others. We’re after the best woman for the job.
So, with those thoughts and memories, I decided to bake. And I made cinnamon rolls. I know how much she loved my cooking and baking so these were made in honor of her love that helped mold me into who I am today. I know that her love will live on in me, and that when the time comes I will be that Grandma.
While I might be coughing my way through the Christmas holidays at Queen's Park, at school in Somerset I continued to be active and healthy. My developing scoliosis did not hamper me physically in any way and, to the best of my recall, never caused speculation or concern among the school staff. There was nothing in my school reports about my health and when my parents did enquire about my scoliosis it was dismissed, according to my mother's account, as a 'scholarly stoop.' I can only remember one episode of breathlessness when I came to a complete halt on a school run, an activity that was generally restricted to days when it was too wet to use the playing fields. After stopping for a minute or two I regained my breath and carried on running.
5. Sweet Susanne (Oberg) 3:31
I remember very little after that. I was crying. I wanted to see my baby. I wanted to get up off of that bed and get into some of those big mesh undies and hold my baby girl. I wanted to see Charlie, wanted my husband. I wanted this to be over.
“Communicating,” Miller offered. “It’s important because then your teammates know what to do.”
Why is this record so different and important that you should immediately pop round the local shop to order a copy? If I rave about how brilliant “Gypsy Blood” is, I risk becoming just another fanatic trumpeting his favorite group. But there is truly something special about Doll By Doll, a U.K. rock band from the late ’70s/early ’80s led by singer, guitarist and main writer Jackie Leven. Two guitars, bass and drums were the basic components, playing in a straightforward rock style that we’ve all heard before. They are musically tight as a group and play with passion. The magic for me, however, lies in two things that elevate this band from hundreds of others who suddenly appeared on the late ’70s scene.
He rushed to the farm. "When I got there, the shots were still flying," he said. "I yelled at the attackers that I was going to kill them."
1945 – The Lost Weekend
I think the definition of prodigal fits the father more than the son. It’s lavish, excessive, extravagant, and almost wasteful. That describes perfectly this love the father had for his wayward son.
One cannot deny that there is something missing in today’s Christian religious vision that was prevalent and vivid in ancient times. Christianity was a doctrine that captured the attention and the spirit of men in that time, completely changing their lives. As a doctrine and practice it was regarded to be noble enough to die for and many in the early church accepted martyrdom. Where is this silver lining, what was that they had back then?
Steve Reed - 9.2 WAR = 4 points
Tip 3. Set goals with your family. Get together and set goals with your family about what needs to be changed. First make a list of positive things that you see in your family. Then make a list of changes need to be made. Draw out step line on how to reach a certain level of family success. Be open with your wife because she sometimes can help you in things you won’t be able to do yourself. Make a goal to have the best family ever existed on Earth. Influence your children and wife to be making a positive difference in someone’s life.
Behind the guile I know I’m scum,
The song by John Hiatt, "Through Your Hands" makes me think of my journey with "Grass for Sarah", and also of all the other incredible things that come from our hands - from a child's art, to penning a poem, playing a musical instrument, building a house, healing, loving, baking, planting.......
Having spent the last two weeks holed up writing for a specific director/producer. I have my first draft finished.
The all-in-one, compact carry-case which allows you to score, measure, trim, emboss and embellish; create boxes, shaped card blanks, envelopes and so much more. The Ultimate Crafter's Companion is everything you will ever need for your card making projects, in one handy and portable carry case. Includes a 24 full page instruction booklet and a 2 1/2 Hour Project & Instructional DVD which takes you step by step through 12 different projects and detailed instructions.
2. Pulver is delicious as Adler, Cumberbatch is a supernatural force of nature as Holmes, Freeman brings an everyman quality to the role of Dr. Watson — though his formidable skills are not to be under estimated — and Scott brings shades of the late Heath Ledger’s Oscar-winning performance as Batman nemesis the Joker to his performance as Holmes’ arch enemy.
The ADA also describes as "tight control" a fasting blood sugar of 129 mg/dl (7.2 mmol/L) though it warns it will be difficult and possibly dangerous to attain this. The AACE recommends a fasting blood sugar of less than 110 mg/dl (6.1 mmol/L).
4. My wisdom teeth are magical. Different dentists have told me they were coming in fine, that I didn’t have any, that I had them removed, and that I would have to have them removed. If only that was the worst of my dental and medical mishaps.
I’m not all that sure why I haven’t read any of Margaret’s books before. I only got back into reading (after a very long break) at the end of 2010 and before that I led a very sheltered bookish existence. I didn’t know of such wonderful authors or never had the chance to experience amazing classics. I chose Atwood for this project because her work has intrigued me for the last couple of years. I, in fact, own five of her books and have always thought of saving them for just the right moment.
It's thanks in part to Davis that they didn't.
The searching enabled within digital archives reorients our thinking about what constitutes relevant information and exposes the kinds of connectivity that we would likely miss or overlook working with print and manuscript in traditional environments. This reorientation, moreover, possesses its own opportunities for serendipity. While serendipitous discoveries made when working in a traditional archive or even browsing in the stacks typically occur within a bounded space and a pre-selected range of call numbers, digital archives and databases enable virtual movement throughout their holdings to uncover relevant but unforeseen connections not bounded by categories of expectations. In short, capable of serving as far more than text delivery systems and repositories, these digital archives and databases function as “discovery aids.” Fostering a culture of connectivity, these intellectual laboratories of sorts can provide access not only to individual titles but also to a larger, dynamic field of textual and sociocultural activity.
The finishing touches I added to wrap up this card were glitter to all the flowers so they sparkled. Just wouldn't be complete without glitter :) I added a white flourish and then added white paint dot spirals in the corners for added detail.
so desired.
the faith of father Abraham (Romans 4:12). When you give your tithes, you’re
Thankfully, he was feeling better today and was excited to head to "school" with cupcakes I had made for his class. "My (c)akes, yeah!" he exclaimed as I loaded them into the car. I explained to him all the way there that they were his cakes, but he would be sharing them with his friends at school. "My (c)akes, yes! (Th)ree!" he said enthusiastically while nodding his head, showing his understanding that they were his cakes because he is turning three...at least, that's how I interpreted it.
Readers can sign an online petition calling for the release of Naser Al Raas here:
Wand JS. Carpal tunnel syndrome in pregnancy and lactation. J Hand Surg (Br) 1990; 15: 93-95.
Our options are not either a-historical “theological” claims or literalist “historical” claims. We shouldn’t confuse or reduce “historical” to journalistic paradigms or blow-by-blow chronology. We need to develop more nuanced accounts of history in order to do justice to the theological. There is much work to be done on this front.
The details are that end station B is one of the large concrete buildings on the SLAC site that was used for electron scattering experiments (electrons from the accelerator hit a target inside the building and are scattered into a detector). It produced the first experimental evidence of the quark model of the nucleus, which was awarded a Nobel way back when (in end station A, but that is a different story). It has been under-utilized in recent years. I’ve been retired from the facility for a few years but have a real fondness for the place. The ledge where these owls hung out is about ~50 feet off the ground and inaccessible to cats and other predators. In one of the articles it was mentioned that the owls wouldn’t make their own nest but would appropriate a raven nest that was already there.
I hope this has helped in some small way. I ask that you give me feedback and if you liked the reading.
lnstead of the above civilised and comfortable facilities, all that P&O grudgingly (that is the correct word) give is the outside deck totally exposed to the North Sea elements.To access this area you have to negotiate very heavy spring loaded doors and raised steel gantries whilst trying not to spill ones drink etc. This is a feat even for the fit and healthy ... how in god's name P&O expect the ones who are not so fit and healthy to negotiate such an obstacle course is beyond me. Think here of senior citizens, the frail and the handicapped. Not forgetting that anyone who before they even attempt such an ordeal has to put on warm clothing to protect themselves from the outside elements. Even then, you have to take into account the wet slippery steel decks and all whilst the ship is moving to and fro.
It’s why I read so much YA. AND why I write it. And some of my favorite stories are those with the most tenacious characters. The ones who, when all is really, really lost, look adversity in the eye—and spit in it. Even when things are their WORST, these characters do not. Give. Up.
So, the only way to get balance, in my world, is to decide what things
When you are de-cluttering your kitchen there are two areas that are always overlooked; they are the cabinet beneath the sink, and the junk drawer. You never know how much a potential buyer will poke around, so you want to clean every nook and cranny, even if you don’t think many people will look there.
ya know.. but other than that..
Moving out of Edinburgh i need to mention Luvians in St Andrews (with a shop in Cuper), from their twitter feed its clear they carry an amazing range of beers, including some beers that havent made it into Edinburgh as far as i know, but even before i was into twitter i had heard rumours of this place so drove all the way there one day just for a beer shop and it was well worth it. Not only did i manage to pick up 2bottle of "How to Disappear Completely" but the selection was pretty impressive and i came away with a fair few new ones
Disc 2A (October 2nd 1995) Yoyogi Olympic Pool, Tokyo, Japan
I remember searching for one line of text in my hardcover Shakespeare’s Complete Works for most of one the night, now I can find that same one line of text, in a digital version of the book, in less than a second, bookmark it, highlight it, or copy it into notes, not worrying about where my pen and paper were.
Pray that our suffering brothers and sisters in India will trust God to enable them to proclaim the gospel even while suffering (2 Timothy 4:16-18).
You can travel to Nikko by 2 options: By a “rapid train”, or a “limited express train”.
I attempted suicide on October 31st by overdosing. I thought I was going to be successful but once again Jesus, my angels or whatever led me out of my motel room where I was discovered by some people (I don't remember anything after taking the pills.)
Given that Sharpe’s patients were part of the study which NICE based their evidence on for developing Guideline 53 is it any wonder patients are angry?” Gabi Jacobs, Sussex; sick for 2 years
Thank you for making each day of my life beautiful.
For Jennifer – For Christmas, AD 2011
to alpine woods
”What do you want?” The Cardinal looked haggard and it came to R that he thought himself right. He really did believe he had done the right thing.
Comments make me happy.
The book asks if I’ve been tempted to ditch the pages. I haven’t, I’ve just not been as invigorated by writing them, especially at their current length. I worked out the difference between my current pages and the old ones. The old sheets had 32 lines per page, the new ones have 47. Times 3 equals 141 rather than 96 thus 45 extra lines each day. Not a huge amount, but it’s like doing 4 and a half pages instead of 3.
Do you really need to fund raise the entire list that you posted? Every single step of the process? You can't pay for any of it on your own? That may mean you really can't afford another child.
I didn't chop off the top strip set yet, because I wasn't sure exactly how tall the wedge would have to be. Then I added some bits toward the left to make it wide enough, and sewed it to the right-hand module.
Bruce Wilson – I am not a designer who imposes my preconceptions on a client. If fact, my role in any project is to listen and interpret, provide supporting information and to make the process as pleasant as possible. I don’t take pen to paper until I have established a budget, a programme and wish list from the client. My only desire as a designer is to do my best work and to delight the client. I work hard to cultivate a good working relationship with my clients and most often we become friends. I take a very holistic approach to design, typically starting with a landscape plan, house design both inside and out and often I am retained to do the furnishing and decorating.
So I'm grateful for so much this season- new friends and old friends, family nearby and family far away, and the fact that God has blessed us with so much to be thankful for- like a new home and neighborhood, new educational opportunities for the kids (Classical Conversations), and mainly just the stability of family life together and the love we share with one another.
You are invited!
Chilli Powder - 1/4 tsp( or more if needed)
1 professor
Recorded in Los Angeles on April One and 2, 1960
Viscount Cowdray and the Pearson family are in joint 164th place, with the newspaper ascribing a 3% (£195m) stake in the Pearson group, parent company to Penguin, to the family. Combined with an auction of family heirlooms in September which raised £7.9m, and the family's other assets, the family's wealth was estimated at £500m, down on £515m last year.
Okay are you all fed up with the hypocrisy in politics? First you hear people like Rick Santorum say President Obama is trying to destroy America. When President Obama tries to encourage people to go to college, Mr. Santorum has the balls to say the President is a snob ( that’s like one 400 pound person saying you are out of shape). Why would someone think a person is a snob when they want others to better themselves? Could it be that Mr. Santorum will have to work harder because he will run into book smart people trying to take whatever job he has? The 1% hates to compete, look at the laws they have passed to make it harder to live the American dream.
Further to one of the news items I posted about last week, football coach Ricardo Morrison was today found guilty of the murder of aspiring model and Hollyoaks actress Amy Barnes. Morrison stabbed Amy to death following a violent argument at the home they shared after she finally told him that she was leaving him.
It is also narrated in the two books (AlBukha^ri and Muslim):
As the article states, and as we have had arguments about many times with fundamentalist Christians, they mistakenly believe that this country is officially a Christian country. They refuse to educate themselves and just believe what they want to believe, and while they can do that with their fictional god and Bible stories, they can’t just make stuff up about the Constitution and the principles on which this country was founded.
40+ lady: Oo meron na.
To maximise the protest we will aim to have as many groups as possible calling Atos at different times in the run up to Christmas. We’ll maintain a list here and on facebook to try and help co-ordinate times/dates and see if we can keep the phonelines buzzing daily in the run up to Christmas. Please contact us by leaving details in the comments, on facebook at: http://www.facebook.com/events/281777128534663/ or emailing us at: notowelfarecuts@yahoo.co.uk
“he believes… there are two sides to England: ‘the monarchist, reactionary, Anglican supremacist ruling-class England’ and ‘the Labour movement England’. The story of the latter is ‘resistance to the domination of the rich and powerful’ and the attempt to have ‘working people recognised’.
Also, my little fawn colored Chihuahua, Capt. Jack, developed epilepsy and was having seizures more frequently. We called the vet in a nearby town, but they just don’t seem to have time for our little pets. They have a lot of country to cover regarding ranch animals. I decided to take Jack to his regular vet in Mexia, Texas.
And the dangerous dance
"Should I fly you all the way up to the moon?" - Linze
My posts are my attempts to share my feelings. Feelings aren’t right or wrong, remember? They just are. It’s what you do with your feeling that could be right or wrong.
deception reigns
After lighting the stove and setting the damper for the first time, the ice shanty became a cozy place to fish. I was catching smelt within moments after dropping a line.
So what? Different cultures are different. Anyone who’s eaten a hot dog or Chinese food or sampled French cuisine could tell you that. We give lip service to the phenomena all the time, saying that we totally understand that people from different cultures are different and that we get it.
Chaos can start with the basics of egging, toilet paper, or the other usual Halloween tricks we all know and love. The more extreme is where the name “Maienstecken” comes from. Toblerone was telling me about his past days and told me a few of the menacing things he and his buddies did:
"The Lord will make the rain of your land powder and dust; from heaven it shall come down on you until you are destroyed.
On Saturday night I went to see Mom perform in the Clarkson choir. It is the same choir that I was in last year, but felt too sick to go to rehearsals in January, February and March so I didn't join this year. I was looking forward to going and hearing the music, but I was also really looking forward to going there and seeing the other choir members with my big belly. Rita, who is one of the producers, saw me in the bathroom, grabbed my hand and hugged me and asked questions and asked me to "please, please, please" tell her when the baby is born. She has been asking about me since January and I think she knows my history. It was a really nice moment.
a. Red trousers with a powder-blue top
Dark harvest
As many students will be fully aware, preparation for exams and essays can be incredibly stressful. Whether at school, college or university, students will likely have some form of revision or studying that needs to be undertaken over the coming weeks and months. The anxiety and nerves that are caused by exams, as well as last-minute cramming, can lead to students developing a poor sleep routine, which will only serve to hamper their ability to perform to the best of their potential.
RQTAQ Blog (rqtaqblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Often times, we know no real details about these people who we talk to on a semi-daily basis. We may or may not know their real names, their occupation, their religious views, or where they're located. All we know is that by some twist of fate, they were brought into our lives by words squished into 140 character limits.
Well, now Josh is 7 years old and somehow, he has gotten a little bit tubby. He has a very healthy appetite. Very healthy. These days on some weekend mornings, he can ask for and eat 4 waffles, a bunch of cut up cheese, 5-6 slices of bacon and 6 mandarin oranges. According to our last doctors visit, he is 50% height and 80% weight. He has gained 20 pounds in the past year. When he sits on the potty, he has little rolls in his midsection. Now we are concerned about his weight in the other direction. Visually impaired children are at a much higher risk of obesity because of the challenges of exercising. Indeed, Josh does not move around much and his great love is sitting around and listening to music.
Rape is not a mental illness!
Grace is a powerful women with little need for money. She is loaded but it is something she doesn’t want to have. Trouble starts coming Grace’s way when Bailey sends her a blue diamond and her cousin ends up dead. With the help of her friends and a Lieutenant Seth Buchanan the mystery client will be solved and the diamonds will be reunited.
To feel the heat and mend the bones
3) Create the all-important blog article idea file.
One lawyer seems to be a pretty funny guy. #theydoexist
Is it legal? And is it right?
Do you remember how exciting it was to see those images and think about what the tone and feel and sense of the movie was going to be? If you don’t it’s probably because the 2nd trailer replaced those feelings for you.
1 signatures
PJ: “2012 has seen me focus on playing more of the right places rather than doing loads of shows. I will be performing on the main stage of Global Gathering Festival, and you can see me at Gibb Street Warehouse in Birmingham on April 27th, my Spectrum Warehouse Party on May 5th, C-Y-N-T in Cardiff on May 6th, and at all future Weird Science and Spectrum events.”
What did you think I was talking about?
* 1 Package of Mixed Charms
But the clue to British GPs is in the name. They are General Practitioners. By-and-large, they know a little about a lot but and a lot about nothing: they are (now) highly-paid generalists not specialists; their job is to filter out all but the most serious cases.
I think I have to go again in a few weeks to take some autumish photos.
(4) Psalm 68:11
Now I have four new Facebook "friends" (so far) and they are all related to me.
Once pre-listening is set up in the preferences, look at the Master track above the Pre-Listening Volume knob, and set the Solo/PFL switch to PFL.
Will the patent protection have a long life ?
In a large bowl, combine the flour, brown sugar, baking powder, baking soda, and salt. Mix well. Add the butter and use a pastry cutter or two knives to break it up until the mixture looks coarse and the largest lumps of butter are no bigger than a pea.
Guinea sees its first ever arrests of wildlife traffickers, with 7 arrests and the seizure of 80kg of ivory and 10 leopard skins.
Four months ago, KVI returned to talk, utilizing a "lite" touchy-feely format free of controversy. At times it's vaguely liberal, but with a dippy New Age presentation.
The winning projects range from artworks on a seaside esplanade to a school’s performing arts centre. The six buildings in the South East region that have won RIBA Awards are:
In this first book in a purported trilogy, Sage is taken from an orphanage by the scheming Conner and taken to his luxurious mansion with fellow orphans Roden and Tobias. The reason? The entire royal family of Carthya has been murdered, with the exception of Prince Jaron, who was on a ship that was attacked by pirates when he was about ten, and has never been found. Conner wants to groom a boy to pretend to be the prince, ostensibly to prevent a war between Carthya and a neighboring kingdom. The boys have a variety of skill levels, education, and attitude problems, but Sage is the worst-- he is constantly fighting against Conner, running off, and being a brat about his new found fortune, mainly because all the boys know that whomever is not chosen will surely die. Despite his contrary personality, Sage develops some allies in the maid servant Imogen and the trainer Mott, who both try to help him, and manages to attract the positive attention of the princess Araminda, who is supposed to marry Jaron's brother, and since he is dead, will marry the boy Conner chooses to be prince. When Conner finally does make his choice, long forgotten secrets are revealed that change the entire game.
What a great word! Applied to a story, it describes the sweep of a complex tale, usually incorporating a quest. It seems now, like many other words before it, to have broadened and weakened its meaning in some contexts, to mean something like "really really good".
May grace and peace be mine in full measure through my knowledge of God in Jesus Christ Name! Amen!
I have been so busy taking care of the many business details and the decisions one has to make, that I don’t really know how I feel about it all yet. But we have had a lot of fun too. All of the children are home and my house has become a homeless like shelter with people sleeping on the floor, on the davenports and on the Lazy Boys until my son-in-law decided enough was enough and engaged two hotel rooms nearby.
But this study is more positive than negative, girls, you can finally stop waking up at half six in the morning to freshly apply your make up, so he doesn’t run out screaming and guys, countless hours at the gym every day is no longer necessary as your woman thinks you have a better body than Ryan Reynolds.
So random. So weird.
After changing, I went for a cup of coffee and spent a few minutes talking to the field superintendent. I don't remember any discussion about the fire; only the storm was discussed, which now was almost over. I headed down the stairs in what was only a light rain.
Steve worked in this city almost ten years ago now. I remember at the airport crying because he was leaving. "Don't worry Mum," he said, "I'm only going for a year". Well, it's been about 8 years now ... and counting!
I made a wedding card for someone in the family who is getting married and hopes her mother will live long enough to get there. I felt it couldn't be too much about happiness, but hope this will make her day a bit brighter no matter what.
let me be the fire that moves your hands through
Why is there so much sodium in everything good?
To talk health, happiness, and prosperity to every person you meet.
Compensation is $20.00 an hour plus mileage.
Do you have a shop where you live featuring just about everything under the sky?
High the hubbub, loud the laughter;
I had a sudden longing, like a pain, for the hot smelly East, and remembered that Everett had said something about an Indian restaurant. I asked the barman, a hot-haired Irishman, and he asked one of the business-men (who, I saw now, was a Pakistani) and then was able to tell me that the Calicut Restaurant was on Egg Street, by the Poultry Market. I went there and ate insipid dahl, tough chicken, greasy pappadams, and rice that had congealed to a pudding. The décor was depressing - brown oily wallpaper, a calendar with a Bengali pin-up (buff, deliriously plump, about thirty-eight) – and it was evident that the few Indian students were eating the special curry prepared for the staff.
March 7, 2012
I was struck by the words of the juror of the show.
It is a very rich feast – one that is filled with meaning (as is appropriate). But all of the meaning takes as its source the gift to creation of the “Lord and Giver of Life,” the Holy Spirit. Just as we are told in Genesis:
Show us your altar, too, if you want.
When the scam unravels, law enforcement may be the last ones to be alerted since members and leaders of the group are too embarrassed to admit being duped to authorities. Crooks know full well the human psychology traits of group thinking and how tight-knit relationships in these structures tend to be. Since the probability of prosecution is low, the criminal element is quickly drawn to such circumstances. However, when the word gets out, arrests can follow, as happened in these three instances.
This lesson continues to remain in my heart. The doctors still don’t know what causes my depression, I’m still susceptible and I’m still weak, but when the disappointments and trials come, I’m no longer bewildered and confused. My first question isn’t “Why, Lord?” but instead “How, Lord?” I still feel my heart break within my chest, but I recognize now that the reason doesn’t change the reality. The path remains before me and my energy is best spent learning to walk it.
Charles A. Barber
Greek yogurt
He called up the “device” and it arrived, new and shiny. Not expensive, but not cheap at $200. The clerk got excited and forgot to keep his cool:
The story is about young girls aged between 15-17 years old, suddenly due to some weird phenomenon lose their life but come back seconds later as a zombie. The zombies are known as “Stacies”. The disease spreads as the “stacies” increase almost like an explosion they spread. Humans vs Stacies, a battle which will be shown.
Miss Yap was working as a part-time model when she was approached to do the nude shots with photographer and modeling agent Chen Jun Hao.
Fresh cranberries are preferable to dried, as the tartness is a necessary contrast to the thick, sweet bread. The demerara sugar works very well here, as it adds a nice crust to the top of the pudding. A finer sugar wouldn't hold up as well in the oven. Originally I baked this in a loaf pan, intending to slice it to serve, but that didn't work. The rice bread is so firm it didn't soften up enough to create a solid mass. No problem, though. I just scooped it out and served it in a pile and it tasted just fine! The bread at the bottom of the dish is soft, while the bread at the top is crunchy, and mixed together you get a little bit of everything. I could eat the whole dish...(don't tell Santa).
cheeses of all kinds from our hosts' *cheese CSA* (be still, my heart!)
Those signs……of all the Sermons we ignored….
Yea
They gave me a small shot of morphine for the pain that was to come. They told me it wouldn’t block the pain, but it would make me not care about it. Sounded great. I got the shot and felt it almost immediately. They were right… I didn’t care.
Put the chicken or turkey in a stockpot and cover with water. Bring up to a simmer and then discard the now scummy water. Cover the bird with water again and this time add in all the other ingredients. Bring to a boil and skim off any foam/scum that rises to the top. Lower to a bare bubble and cook for 2 hours. You don't want the stock boiling because it will make the meat very tough, so make sure it really is a bare bubble. After 2 hours, fish the chicken or turkey out of the pot and pull all the meat off the bones and save it for later. Return the bones/cartilage/skin/etc to the pot and cook for another 2 hours. Strain, bottle, and refrigerate. If you're lucky it will turn to jello in the fridge!
As usual I was too shy to say “hi”.
So I wondered around the venue to see who I knew there as Kittie shows brings out the same crowd year after year. I made my rounds and then found myself wanting to get the hell out of there as the current band on stage was really sucking and how out of place I felt. I used to show up at concerts in all black, boots, and covered in patches and spikes. But with how busy I have become, I am lucky to remember a shirt to wear after work. So I wore black jeans and a black shirt with a skeleton on it; I felt so out of place. Even around my peers, I felt odd. It frustrated me. So Kittie finally came on stage to step up their equipment and do the sound check and it seemed like Morgan didn’t recognize me and nether did any of the other girls. They used to know my by “Patches”, and give me hugs. but I felt like stranger……………
1 tablespoon grated lemon, zest of
Abhay Deol will unveil himself in a South Indian sporting moustache look. The second lead star Emraan Hashmi is a small town photographer in the movie who does unusual jobs and has two or three press cards with him. He is a multitasking man. His character undergoes a transformation and finally faces his own reality.
Eyes: MAC Untitled, Tick: Tock Infinity base in Milky Way. Scorching applied to entire eye area, Karma placed in outer corner of upper and lower lid. One coat black mascara.
Finally, bearing in mind that you clearly, either did not conduct the necessary due diligence about Clitoraid, or that you thought nobody would notice, wouldn’t it be easier to just back out of supporting them?
It's a damning indication of how my young brain was influenced by TV in the 80s when I can't say "South Africa" without that bloody song coming into my head. Oh well! My colleague brought a few bottles back from SA for me to try, which was nice of her, so I owe it to her to post my thoughts. Or at least I promised I would.
In France a seed treatment insecticide known as thiamethoxam was found to interfere with the bees homing instincts. In fact, bees from colonies that were treated with the insecticide were two to three times more likely to die away from their hive.
“I understand, sir,” Lorovic said, still carefully keeping any hint of his true feelings out of his voice.
( all at the same time.... cause I'm good like that )
We can’t avoid letting this topic drift briefly into the Christian realm. When Moses asked God His name, God answered, “I am that I am.” The name God gives for Himself is I Am.
The BBC are saying that Lord Pearson has recorded an interview to be shown over the weekend for BBC's Hardtalk programme with Brillo, and have revealled that UKIP will not be standing against Conservatives Philip Davies, Doug Carswell & Phillip Hollobone and "at least" one unnammed Labour MP who are all well know EU Sceptic MP's.
I nod me head in some kind of agreement as the bar-lady places her quite exquisite breasts down onto the bar in front of me!
What does this mean about human life?
He was investigating a member of this same group that I was.
The two machines I have narrowed my decision down to are:
Speaking of dating, do you guys have any dating deal breakers? :) My friend recently went out with a guy who wouldn't stop biting her while they kissed, and she woke up with bruises the next day! Isn't that straight out of Sex & the City?
On to the ocean, on to the sea.
Each to their own is the rule (although, curiously, talk with any journalist off the record and they are willing to give you their express opinion of who is up to scratch and who is not). The test here is not of the DA, but of the standards to which South Africa's media holds itself. Either it can shoot the messenger, drown it out with invective, or it can interrogate and respond to the message conveyed. If any precedent is to be set, its nature is the media's to determine. The decision it makes in this regard will say much about its attitude.
Here's rhetorical term 1 I've selected from Lanham's Rhetoric (as I shall call it)
i swear, every time i looked at him those first few days, i teared up.
7. B-Legit - Hands on Them Knees
This week I have selected some baby photos of my two girls, probably because working on the neonatal unit at the moment is making me incredibly broody (I knoooow.....):
Relaxation Response
So we've been out and about, finding some cool refuge in the movie theatres and galleries.
the whole valley is witness.
The brillo-headed, piggy-eyed older girl never picked on me again after that day – in fact, I think she went out of her way to avoid me, since we never walked home the same route again – but for a time, Roxanne Green treated me like shit, and generally made my life a living hell.
And you'll get compliments, I know, from everyone on your team!
The eating delights of downtown Minneapolis are many, and if you have extra days in town, I encourage you to explore (or ask me—I live to recommend). One dinner, however, is taken care of, and that’s Saturday night, when we close out the conference at Town Hall Brewery, conveniently located next the conference hotel.
Tommy and Frankie's eyes met. A nearly imperceptible twinkle flashed between them, and then ear-to-ear smiles cracked their beaming faces. Laughter filled the kitchen, and Tommy smacked the table with his meaty palm, causing some of Frankie's coffee to slosh out of its cup.
You have until midnight (GMT) Tuesday 17th April to get your entries in and be in with the chance of winning Five Fabulous D'Arcy Digi's.
thing of music being treated as a joyous thing, part of life.
So, yeah.
Dear Winter 2012,
So happy today is Friday! I've been lost all week long, thinking Tuesday was Wednesday and Wednesday was Thursday. Today is Friday, for real!
The statement says the platform was undergoing maintenance when the problem was detected. The tilt, caused by water entering a platform pillar, has been corrected.
most appalling wrong, why it’ll be concentration camps next, watch towers and long trains pulling wagons loaded with a human cargo, why to even think racially is an evil, didn’t you know we’re all the same, all of us, all equal none better and none worse, merely equal, merely here and nothing else.
Firstly, I have forgiven myself for not putting any posts up for the last 2 days – hope you didn’t miss me too much. ; )
Growing these plants is one of the most space and work efficient ways to grow your own food. Although the mounds require quite a bit of space between them, growing several plants per mound means more plants overall. The lower space in between often acts as swales or berms in which the water collects and soaks into the ground. I'm growing them in a hex pattern this year, in an attempt to fit as many mounds into my small garden as possible. We'll see how it works.
She took him back to her apartment and they had sex several times.
I'm pretty excited for this weekend because I'm going on my first ever blate(blog date)!! Meg from henning love and I are going to meet for lunch and maybe some shopping? I couldn't be more excited to officially 'meet' her! Tune in Monday for pictures!
weeks, due to the movie Dark Shadows and Barnabas Collins, the first romantic vampire, who led the change from frightening to the seductive ones full of pain about being a vampires (mmm. . . think Angel, Anne Rice’s vamps, etc…) and with the upcoming Abraham Lincoln, Vampire Hunter film, I will be blogging about
Because the inner planets cooled in a progression inversely proportional to their distance from the sun, number four was the first to cool to the point where life could arise. The later inhabitants of number three who invented those belt names called this planet MARS, after their god of war, because in their time from their planet's surface number four appeared reddish, the color of their blood, a prominent feature of warfare. Thus, the logic behind the applied name. Well, at least they didn't call it "something belt."
Faith came out first, singing some of her old songs, plus three new ones, from an album to be released later this year. When someone requested "It Matters To Me", which wasn't on her set list, she had to see if any of her band knew it, and when the piano player was able to play the music, she sang the first verse and chorus.
could have a good time with a rock. But that's ok...after I finished the beer I bought for myself, I went home, put on the sexist dress in my closet - the one that shows off my cleavage - and headed out to the fundraiser that I was going to skip to go out with you. It ended up being a good night.
As a pre-published writer I didn’t really look past the goal of getting an agent and then a book deal. It’s such a huge, difficult thing to achieve, especially these days. Things happened fast after the Cornerstones win, and I found that my journey had only just started. The learning curve is huge and no one has time to tell you anything, so you wing it. Possibly the worst thing is that it becomes increasingly difficult to find time to write, which is what you love doing and is the only reason you’re here in the first place.
Day, then your birthday, then burial.
The ex-girlfriend told police that she had just ended a seven-month relationship with Terrell, sparking an argument that escalated when Terrell allegedly grabbed her, causing bruises on her upper arms, chest and neck, according to court records.
Steve said, “Pleased to meet you Sandra Baxter. You are tagging along with us.”…
“DOE’s stated goal–to clean up all weapons sites within 30 years–is unfounded because it is not based on meaningful estimates of work to be done, the level of cleanup to be accomplished, or the availability of technologies to achieve certain cleanup levels. Neither DOE nor any other agency has been able to prepare reliable cost estimates for the total cleanup.” (Box A, pg. 7).
The bars, restaurants, discos and strip bars begin to open in abundance at around four o’clock. The bars are of every persuasion to suit every niche market.
We are not together.
Do you remember Peter, Peter, Pumpkin Eater? Well here he is and all glory* WINK*
I've done a bit of digging online but not found anything relating to this particular problem. However I've been disappointed with comments I've seen around the life of Apple devices. Hence I'm starting to think mine may be on the way out.
I have always wondered though,... How did the Blowup doll actually get pitched? How did this meeting take place?
Was laid by William Lowes, Esq.
After our drunken, deep conversation, it’s clear he wasn’t joking when he said his mind isn’t in the right place for a relationship, but regardless of where this goes, I’m glad we’ve kept in touch and seen each other again. He’s a very smart guy, more than I’d have given him credit for, and a great laugh.
While in Seattle my lovely new bride and I ventured into a radical little bookstore by Pikes Market called Left Bank Books. I’m not using the word “radical” as some of you may wish I would-which would be the Ninja Turtles sense of the word. I actually mean it in the sense that it’s far from a mainstream book store. From what I’ve gathered, it’s actually a collective co-op, rather than a business, mainly distributing counter-cultural material ranging from obscure zines to works by widely acclaimed academics.
Sunset Lagoon, my Villains & Vigilantes via Tunnels & Trolls game of SuperPunk/CyberPower is set in a variant of the Blade Runner/Prometheus/Alien shared universe, and is a bit weird to explain. At present, the PCs are playing actors portraying explorers of a Lost World found inside a mountain cyst, but are actually exploring likesame, and contacting alien biotech and other weirdness. The character range from Night Wolf, a lawyer turned vigilante, to a battlesuit operator sent by the ElectroMagnetic realm as an Apostle of the Singularity, to Amber Magic, a botched genetic test tube baby who can open teleport doors and has a scorpion tail. All of my players rock!
A great periodical this. Though I’ve generally just dipped into it in bookstores, it does require longer attention as the articles are usually thoughtful and thought-provoking.
Creative Memories Circle Cutter
Sex
Rich, odd, bombastically self-confident, unconcerned with what anyone thought of him. He wasn’t often right, but he always had a very strong opinion that he was eager to share. More important than being right, he made us think. … He’s also so far been proven wrong about the immediacy of Peak Oil and its dire aftermath of $500 crude and total societal collapse. It might yet happen, and if it does let’s hope that the downslope is gentler on us than it would have been had we not heard Simmons’ Cassandra calls.
This layer will in fact host the starting screen for the game. It is here that you will create the movie clip with the text field, since it will be erased anyway. This movie clip is going to be stored in the Library, so it really isn’t necessary to create a separate layer for it.
We had so much fun messaging backwards and forwards, and decided to leave the finished products as a big of a surprise.
Even the hints of future villains in the form of Norman Osborn and the shadowy (and apparently somewhat shaggy and unkempt) figure of Otto Octavius aren’t enough of a curiosity to keep me watching. The general uninspired-ness of the premier episodes put me in a bad enough mood to indefinitely halt any and all plans I had of keeping up with this series.
And then that day when my little eggies were meant to met Spunkheads little swimmers and turn into magical cells and start multiplying our world came crashing down. We found the reason for our infertility. Looking through the microscope in the lab there was my little egg in the middle of the petri dish and Spunkhead's swimmers were doing all they could to get the hell out of there. They were as far away as possible from entering my egg. It seems I had some kind of repellent against him and all of a sudden the love making and drive to become a parent became about science, it was sterile and smelt of antiseptic. No longer was it about the two of us but now a team of experts in white coats who seemed to have forgotten that we were people who felt and hurt. We came home that night...the silent drive back to our little home and I packed his bags and put them at the front door.
However, let us give Bonnie G the benefit of the doubt and assume that her tale of African and Asian Romans is true and then lets consider the ramifications of this. To take Bonnie's analysis to its logical conclusion, there must also be no such thing as an indigenous African, after all, although it might not suit Bonnie's narrative to admit it, the Arab slave traders got to Africa long before the Romans got here, and they stayed a damn sight longer (in fact they were still there well into the 20th century) they most certainly raped and mixed their genes with the locals. Why doesn't the melodious Ms. Greer pop over to Kenya, Uganda, Zaire and Tanzania and tell them they are not indigenous?
The real gluttony actually started with lunch...but that´s another story for another day, because right now I have to prepare for class in half an hour, and this weekend I´m taking trip to Pamplona!
You are an inspired soul… each of your posts is a step forward! Keep walking, you may want to try “reverse gratitude”, for the content you share today, with the powerful intent of healing… would have never found expression if you hadn’t made a very strong inner intent to HEAL YOURSELF!! God Bless you… each of your ALTERS heal… with expression!! Love, Mystiic
today i read the parable of the sower (Mark 4:1-20). and today i am ready to write.
PA: Kris, it’s time for bed.
Shapely beyond the limits of structural reason, her well-proportioned gluteus maximus seems to hold sway over the entire universe. Dominating the celestial proceedings like a fully illuminated moon on a clear night in Whitehorse, the creased mound of amplified flesh at the centre of this highly erotic undertaking will sit on your face until you give in to its abundant charms. Oh, and don't bother trying to scream for help, as your pathetic cries will no doubt be muffled by the sheer weight of its girthy aplomb. The greatest film about ass appreciation ever produced, Tinto Brass's All Ladies Do It (a.k.a. Così Fan Tutte) is a film that repeatedly tests one's patience for scenes that revolve around the worship and the glorification of an Italian woman's sublime backside. Luckily for me, I'm not mentally ill, and embraced the film's butt-centric point-of-view with a jaunty brand of effervescent ease. Wait a gosh darn minute. Did you just say this was, and I quote, "The greatest film about ass appreciation ever produced"? Yeah, I know what you're thinking, the market is flooded with films–and I use the term "films" rather loosely–that purportedly celebrate asses, how do you know this particular film is the greatest? Well, first of all, those other ass flicks are complete and utter trash, and I don't mean "trash" in an ironic, "Kesha is awesome," sort of way ("hot and dangerous"), they're actual garbage ("stockings ripped up all the side"). And secondly, Tinto Brass (Salon Kitty) seems to be one of the few directors out there who realizes that most genitals aren't equipped with eyes. Understanding that engorgement starts in the mind's eye, Tinto wraps his fetishization of the female caboose in a candy-coloured cloak of pure fabulousness. In other words, he balances the perverted and the aesthetic in a way that keeps both ends of the titillation spectrum happy.
For now, balance. I do what I can for whom. We'll see what the future holds when it unfolds.
So one of my good friends Chris Yee aka Crez is a crazy artist (as I’m sure you can tell from his interpretation of the Avengers above^) and is definitely due for big things in the future if not now. Check his blog and take a look at some of the works he has posted up there. I’m sure you’ll agree his work is cray!
Agile recommends embracing and adapting to change. It recommends permitting changes at any time to ensure highest business value and satisfaction. It allows the building of a Release Backlog, which is essentially “product requirements”, further decomposed into Iteration Backlogs, for the purpose of understanding the requirement set being undertaken at the time. CMM, on the other hand, has an entire process area devoted to Requirements Management, prescribing the need to ensure scope creep is contained through Scope Control, which is strictly enforced through the additional rigor of the Configuration Management process area.
She went right out the doggie door and picked herself a cucumber.......it would have been a tomato if they had been ripe.... Baily is looking at me as if to ask, "What the HECK" she would never go out and do that herself...but she sure wants her fair share!!
Ch: chain
DS aged 2 years 10 months still can’t pronounce the L sound at the beginning of words. As a result light = might, legs = eggs, and Lego = eggo.
Wicked, our book club’s selection this month, was not a book I expected to enjoy. It is a retelling of the Oz story from the point of view of the Wicked Witch of the West, beginning with her birth and childhood and ending with her infamous death by water bucket. I am not a fan of the whole Oz story-verse generally, but I did enjoy Wicked, very much.
From the How-to-lose-business-without-really-trying Department:
Each apple and blueberry pie will be served with chilled creamy vanilla bean sauce. I like how this simple pie can satisfy any crave. It somehow makes you feel warm, cuddly and would probably like to snuggle up under a throw over.
I stamped my image and coloured it with promarkers. I then decided I was going to make my VERY FIRST shaker card! Oh m this was so fiddly but i managed it by using and empty double sided tape roll, i filled it with little butterflies made with a Martha Stewart Punch.
The Central District is a delightful mix of money and squalor. Beautifully restored houses sit next to rundown saggy bungalows, and coffee shops and kid boutiques exist alongside shady looking establishments -- you couldn't pay me a million tacos to enter some of those places.
No not the LMFAO song. I have better taste than that.
I wasn't the only one ebbing and flowing on the growth chart, the Hubs was too! And when he decided to get serious, I got serious. He started working with a personal trainer 3 days a week and I would just copy what he did, diet wise.
Ebooks took off. To make matters even worse you could use a cellphone to read a book. Imagine that! And of course tablets. And of course your computer screen. And someone out there realized that all those people who were paying to be "self-published" would love to put their books in Ebook format. And to sell them or give them to the public. But during this time the "real" publishers and agents were still just sitting and talking and eating their soup as the second course. "Nothing to worry," about they said. "Just a handful of frustrated wannabes are going to try and do it. And besides, who is going to sell their stuff?"
And here's a little bonus for all of my fellow New York Rangers lovers. A fun shot of some of the guys letting loose at Marc Staal's wedding reception (from left: NYR Captain Ryan Callahan, Defenseman Dan Girardi, videographer Damien Gilbert, Winger Brandon Dubinsky and Defenseman Michael DelZotto).
I love my kids with all my heart, and more, but to have that tiny break it is just a great feeling!!
Here am I, collapsed on the settee after a bit of a tiring day, Coronation Street on the box, belly full and almost nearly ready to head up the stairs to bed.
Yesterday evening was gorgeous and a long hack was perfect! We did a big figure 8 by the Test Group. It took us an hour and half. We did a lot of trotting and some short canters. Nothing we did really taxed her. As of yesterday she's been back in work for a week. It's been an easy week that was meant to stretch her out and assess where she's at physically. I would venture to say that I feel she has lost about 35% of her fitness.
E-mail: perry@petridehalifax.ca
Recommended for those looking for romances about the complications of orchestrated romantic meetings and difficulties of finding love after you’ve reached a certain age.
What did the Met Police do when told that no documents existed? I am sure there are many people who would like to tell the police that there is no documentation regarding what the police want to know about. That’s why there are rules and procedures in place to allow the police to look for such documents. I can’t imagine it’s standard procedure simply to accept the word of the witness that there are no documents.
I used my Gypsy & Cricut to design the letter.
EDUKATE YOSELF
Lately, I’ve been caught up in listening to an audio book. Until now, I’ve only ever listened to audio books as a passenger in a car, on a many-hour drive to a vacation destination. It was a great way to pass the time and the book had my full attention, more or less.
Addie had her first official "drop off" play date today. Up until this point, Addie has only been dropped off with family... I'm overprotective, I know.
I am adding two links about going grey....
I then cut her out and glued to a yellow embossed circle which is matted with a white circle and a purple Label 3 die cut. I popped this whole panel up on foam tape. Next I stamped the sentiment in Memento Rich Cocoa and added a Martha Stewart Monarch Butterfly to the corner of the panel. To finish I coloured some Clear Kaisercraft Rhinestones with Y06 and added them to the Label 3 panel and also to the butterfly.
I heard Mica cheer for us as we made our final descent into the football stadium. "I don't want to sprint to the finish," I said to Kim. But we still clasped hands and I screamed as we crossed the finish line.
and no one was around,
What this allows the race engineers to do is shift the ‘ride height curve’ down the map for a lower initial (static) ride height. Knowing that the splitter will not ground in the end of straight condition. Therefore with the unstalled wing having a lower ride height, more downforce can be generated. When the wing is stalled the lack of downforce is less consequential as the car is on the straight. Plus there may still be the small boost in top speed from the lack of induced drag from the stalled wing.
Under His wings, what a refuge in sorrow!
· Just because you gave me a big tip doesn't give you carte blanche for being an @$$hole!!!
Wrap twine around a vase or a mason jar and it becomes a pretty decorative addition to a room. Use jute twine to add a rustic touch, or colored baker's twine for a more contemporary or festive look.
If discipleship is for all Christians, and the definitive part of being one, then what does that look like according to Willard? For one, he establishes that there is no evidence in the Biblical text that one could “enjoy forgiveness at Jesus’s expense and have nothing more to do with him”(13). This is his first point and the most inescapable part of Jesus’s teachings. When Christ commissioned the disciples to “make disciples” He had already defined what that meant. Every disciple would: be like Christ (Matt. 10:42), count the cost and renounce all for Him (Luke 14:26; 33), abide in His word (John 8:31), love one another (John 13:35), and bear fruit (John 15:8). This is characteristic of a deep relationship and obedience towards Christ. This is where Willard breaks down a little bit and his personal desires come through. Jesus never said anything to the effect of “God’s goodness is so great, I am sure He will let you in if He can find any basis at all to do so” (17). Jesus Christ is the ultimate authority and path to the Father, and putting God’s goodness in such a light as to cast a shadow on His holiness is a fatal mistake to make. If Christ and His teachings shape our theology, then Willard’s comment on the relationship between salvation and discipleship is hurtful and unconstructive towards that end. Especially since he speaks against the dichotomy of “converts” and “disciples”, realizing that such a dichotomy would make Christ’s lordship and the believers subsequent discipleship optional. Nonetheless, this leads to what three parts make up Willard’s perspective of discipleship.
Then, they broke the news of how to get me on the backboard. They were going to use the comforter to get me on it, but then had to get me off the comforter. The whole maneuver involved more pain, more screaming, more cursing and more morphine. But finally, I was on the board and being slid in slightly more comfort towards the stretcher and ultimately the ambulance.
It was no so good for Thokk, who had to charge in next and bang on the wall where Poppy located the door in an effort to unlock it, taking a bolt of energy for his work. Once this was done, Poppy had to come back in and take a hit from the bolt while she used her thieves tools to finally unlock the door. This three part act went on through 3 or 4 small rooms, until Thokk bowed out and Hex took over the athletics. Finally, after every one’s hair was on end and smoking, they opened a door that led not to another small chamber, but to another great hall much like the first. We will end the tale here, as the party finally escapes the gauntlet of doors and looks forward to the next danger, each victory bringing them one step closer to defeating the Tomb of Horrors and thus getting their lives back (or so they think…)
The techiest of the techies see the world through tech-colored glasses. Everything, they insist, should and will be virtual in the future. Maybe they're right, I don't know. But I do know that not all people are computer-savvy now, nor will they all be computer-savvy in the future. And not all who are computer-savvy prefer to spend their time in the virtual world rather than the real world. Believe it or not, Kindle fans, some people still prefer a book with paper pages. Some would rather talk than tweet. Some would even... I know this will come as a surprise... some would even prefer to receive a bouquet of real flowers from a three-dimensional boyfriend rather than a virtual-bouquet icon from a Facebook app. Go figger!
"No." She said, "No, I don't. I get Rushy to get money out of the bank for me, and I just use cash."
Tsunami Warning Update:
The Houston based printer we use did recently open back up but they raised their prices 25% to cover the costs of what they lost in the huricane. I can't afford that so we're looking for another alternative vendor to print DP pads, we think we might have found a printer in Ark. called Drumline that can make DP pads at a reasonable cost. That's the bad news, the good news is that we're collaborating with another stationery company to bring a couple of DP journals to market in the next month.
Teal: Miles 7-12, Not bad still in terms of running. I took off my gloves somewhere within this stretch. BIG MISTAKE, big huge mistake. Even though they were wet I should have never taken them off. It was about this time that I noticed my neck and face were numb. The neck part was a little scary and I started running thoughts in my head about if I was too cold or not. I ate like 5 Swedish fish right after 6 and I wanted to eat again at 12 but my right arm was not working. I am internally freaking out at this point. My right arm is completely numb and my right hand is turning all shades of random colors and slightly swollen. I tell Beth I am freezing at this point.
Five very happy years with only one terrible sad event, our loss of Pup.
Sydney Brenner
Information minister Rais Yatim, he of the PhD from King’s College, London, seems to have suffered a lapse of memory about the meaning of truth and integrity of information.
Evaluation: I thought this was an excellent read for anyone who is a fan of Evanovich or authors like her. Rose is a quirky, sheltered, at times indecisive character who you are rooting for throughout the novel. My only complaint is that sometimes her indecisiveness with her feelings toward the neighbor Joe sometimes border on irritating.
Or bask and rub their paws in noonday sun,
Achieve greater print quality and image control with the Epson R2400
Take care and see you soon! Vivian
Yikes, the project has grown! Surprise, surprise. Jay, my friend and building remodeler, has come up with lots of ideas to make this house work for me. So that sheet rock that needed resurfacing, well, now there are new holes, new walls, and I guess those guys will be around here working a bit longer than I had anticipated. But all that is still in the future as we are waiting for the doors and windows to be delivered. There is still lots to do to in the meantime. Just finding the right color paint for the exterior was a challenge. First I had to get over the fact that the building code in Jacksonville dictates color. There are a lot of choices but it was the principle of there being a rule that got to me. Oh, you didn’t know I have a thing about authority? After buying a couple of colors and sampling and rejecting them, I just went and knocked on the door of a house I like a couple of blocks away. They were happy to share the information on the paint they used. Should have done that in the first place; I had been admiring that house for the past year. Speaking of which, I have to get into town this morning to get some of that paint. I’ll keep you posted on my progress.
The cut off for the ATC's will be the 20th of October back to me, so I can collate and return to participating artists:):):)
Direct X. IT is your marriage duty to assist one another in the education of your children.(43)
I grew up with this paradigm; I was taught it, raised in it, and started out my own journey as a parent embodying it. But as I grew, and learned, and changed, I began to disagree with these "parenting fundamentals" and refute, both within myself and with others:
Later that day, April was really worried about Grace, but Jude dodged most of her questions with questions about her. They ended up at her house, with no one else home.
The Black Hollies: New Jersey dudes who can do the Psycedelic, Garage, Punk, rock beat like no one. They do it all and give you a firm handed spanking in between.Black Joe Lewis & The Honeybears: My favorite Austin Band right now. They won't disapoint if you like a little R&B in your garage rock, and a little James Brown to kick it up a notch.
£3.99 from Sainsbury’s Dalston
1 medium size capsicum
When the Communists are eventually fully in charge the life of Jung Chang's parents, siblings and Jung Chang herself is one of relative luxury. At first the husband and wife are only allowed to spend the night together once a week, but eventually they have superior accommodation in Yibin together. They have a wet nurse, a maid and various other trappings. Things take a bit of a downturn when a powerful woman called Mrs Ting tries to seduce the father but they move to Chengdu be out of her influence.
Little Man’s still watching. Like he’s thinking what to do. He looks real pale in the sunlight.
And I am not normal, I suppose. For pete's sake, real football, i.e. soccer, is my favorite sport. In many area of this country, that is almost un-American in the minds of some.
They vow to survive, to return to reclaim their fortress and save the Veil.
298 6. “What Do We Really Want to Learn About the President?” Public Interest Law Reporter, Loyola University of Chicago School of Law, April 1998, p. 2-7. See Item D-I/23/1998, below.
Birthday Blessings because I collect teacups and LOVE this image, as well as the size of the Happy Birthday font.... it's so easy to tuck in anywhere on your layout!
For some reason, his stuff (except for the tennis balls – he wouldn’t go anywhere without two stuffed in his mouth) got tossed in with all of my other unpacked boxes. I guess I didn’t really think he’d need all his old stuff, that I’d get him new things once he settled in but it became pretty clear pretty soon that he wasn’t going to.
Aardvark Steel 3
You know, just today I was thinking of the armed forces. I was thinking that people would pick up the newspapers and speak of how terrible that some girl was murdered or some guy, but won't give a second thought to the simple fact they were happy to send their children off to the armed forces, to do just that. Murder is murder regardless and state sanctioned murder does not absolve anything. They don't even begin to imagine the hell that the Afghans, the Iraqis, the Libyans and soon, the Iranians, must be going through, to have bombs dropped on their heads, children, husbands and wives murdered, maimed, children turned into orphans, men and women widowed..... They don't even begin to think that their taxes are funding the wars and yet will scream blue murder at how angry they are paying 0.00000001% or whatever of their yearly income to helping people without work live, work that is becoming increasingly scarce due to immigration.
When the sun started to come up, the cats decided they'd had enough sleeping and it was time to get up, which meant more jumping on me to see why wasn't I awake? The sun was up! Time to get out of the basement!
What kind of Neurowear would you like to see next?
Because Kim from Let Me Start By Saying did such a cool dessert post before, I’m am featuring her very fine-looking recipe here. I especially like that it shamelessly utilizes a cake mix in order to allow you to look like June Cleaver without having time to get too hot from standing over the oven. Grab your popsicles and pull up a chair on the deck! I invite you all to make these lip-smacking little numbers and share your thoughts.
de la Riva - Many of the designs featured here are recent examples of minimalism. The de la Riva logo exemplifies the 1970′s design aesthetic; the logo is still minimalist, but the appropriated Japanese flag and the wavy, vaguely-serif typeface are both timeless and indicative of the era in which this logo was created. It is probably one of the best and most unique logos in Jiu Jitsu. The design’s invocation of the Hinomaru flag ties Jiu Jitsu to its roots; the rising sun represents the power and divine origins of the Japanese emperor. This logo is particularly interesting since de la Riva is part of the Carlson Gracie team, where angry animals are a prerequisite for team logos. Like de la Riva’s crest, most of the logos that are featured are circular. This is primarily an artifact of Jiu Jitsu team patches being circles, which was the main form of embroidered patches on the back of Jiu Jitsu athletes’ gis.
Sometime later, Moon felt himself been dropped back onto the grass, there was only one thought on his mind now...
Pour remainder of batter over bars.
29. Seen a total eclipse
I love their bare feet and that some are in ankle booties and that this feels like this free, indie, kaleidoscope, sun kissed song!
Swamp Thing #8
"I can't. I left some papers at home and I need them for a presentation tomorrow," I told him. His lips felt so good and I loved the way his body felt next to mine. It was hard to resist.
1. News headlines Page 101 was the only way outside of newspapers and radio and TV news bulletins to get the latest news on demand. It was a classic founding part of the Ceefax service.
Ho Chi Minh City
know what they are.
While the others rushed off with their separate conclusions, the seventh blind man had taken the time to pet the elephant, to walk all around it, to smell it, to feed it, and to listen to the sounds it made.When he returned to the city and found the populace in a state of uproar between the six factions, the old man laughed to himself: he was the only person in the city who was not convinced he knew exactly what an elephant was like.
Is the race still winnable for Santorum – yes: from the New York Times: total delegates needed to win 1144, delegates remaining 1258 – Romney has 568, Santorum 273 – therefore Romney needs 576 more delegates, while Santorum requires 871, or a difference of 295 delegates separate the two competitors. With the 1258 remaining, it is not impossible for either candidate to reach the magic 1144. This is perhaps, why the left and the Romney campaign are now ramping up the attacks, looking for every possible religious reference or gaff to play to the hilt.
Their limitlessly exciting and pure emotions expressed through lovely smiles and flirtatious glances overpower cupid himself, who gives up his bow. But the schemes of these utmost intoxicating women never could overpower his senses.
Stella Deus – The Gate of Eternity (PS2)
4.Speed - 02:56
So what now? Well, Jack is fast asleep. He had an enormous dinner, a nice warm shower, and cuddled into me while I read him a really long Dr. Suess (is there any other kind?) Tomorrow, we will do it all again - but with a slightly calmer demeanour. Well, cross fingers anyway! I can only hope that when it comes time to take Phoebe for her first day in Prep, I am as restrained as I was today...however, I have a sneaking suspicion that by the time Maisie's first day rolls around, the ugly crier could very well make a public appearance...what do you think?
If you are one of those people who didn’t get the memo that a hit or trauma to the breast does not cause breast cancer, please let me now disabuse you of that notion. It is an urban myth, a wives tale, a total fallacy. The only thing that is true about a “hit to the breast” is that it is helluhpainful.
don’t forget Mary Jane she’s been lit alive,
Oh, and the best part? This is a very easy pattern. I started the pants when J. went down for his morning nap. I ironed the fabric (which had been washed to pre-shrink it and was therefore wrinkly), copied and assembled the pattern, cut the fabric and almost finished sewing before he woke up an hour and a half later. The only things I had left to do were putting the elastic on the waist band and finishing the cuffs for the hems. I did that last night after J. went to bed. Altogether about two hours for the whole thing, and putting together the jigsaw puzzle of a pattern took some time…
Her feminist values were placed in the back burner when she realized that her affair with Roger wasn’t leading to anything serious. Somewhat unwillingly, she took her mother’s advice and married the surgeon, who seemed to be a great catch. Unfortunately, when he returned from his deployment, Joan learned he chose to return to battle. This is where we see Joan’s true essence shine through in one of my favorite scenes by putting her foot down and refusing to be second to his commitment to the armed forces.
Oh fuck yes.
While we were thrilled to be leaving the hospital, this was a terrifying time. We were taking home my dad who was now, my dad functioning with a brain injury. We were thrown to the wolves! There was no direction given by the professionals. We were forced to pray our way through this new way of life. My dad was facing extreme frustration and tried several times to leave without telling us. In his limited use of words, he expressed feeling like too much of a burden on my mom and I and thought we'd be better off without him. It was in this time of deep despair that I shared with him, once again, what the Holy Spirit had placed on my heart. The next day he indicated that he was willing to give it a try.
Right lets begin, firstly I'd suggest making a copy of the image you want to use, this way you will have the original from which you can use again, I always work on copies of my photo's.
The people who work there are very nice. Things like that make your shopping experience very pleasant. At COSMO there are a few Japanese employees as well as a few Indonesian employees who speak Japanese well. I believe some of them speak English, too, so if you have any questions, I’m sure they will be happy to answer your them.
The horrific implications that will likely result from this are staggering...for Israel, for the West, and believe it or not, for the Arabs themselves.
2005 Maume Gevrey Chambertain 1er Cru Lavaux St. Jacques (100% Pinot Noir)–A fabulous wine from the first ‘vintage of the century’ in Burgundy. Brought by the same friends who brought the Corton-Charlemagne, we popped and poured this before the white was all gone. The nose was somewhat muted, but started to give off some raspberry and ‘forrest floor’ after some aeration. On the palate, very balanced with bright berry fruit and gripping acidity. Outstanding. 92 points.
* Aidan loves to build things with his legos and blocks, play with trucks, dance to silly songs, do puzzles and read books.
The doll furrowed his tiny brow. "I suppose it was a sticky situation, to put it mildly." His dark, beady eyes focused on Sam for a moment before turning back to her father.
and the heartfelt feel of his hands as he holds you.
Recently there was an event in England all about this great writer/singer/musician (review here) and fans were asked to pass comment about their memories of GSH, their feelings about his music (asked by Lemn Sissay here). I did pass a memory over and found myself remembering the time, back in about 1990, when I used to listen to a lot of Gil Scott Heron (and so therefore his collaborator Brian Jackson too - lovely article by Brian about Gil here by the way). I had a dodgy job in advertising at that time and an all-consuming nightclub and music habit so I spent quite a lot of time in my car (these days I drive very little). I had a couple of GSH cassettes back then (yes, cassettes!) that I listened to again and again. In the end, thinking of folk club tonight and something to read aloud, I wrote this poem today. I didn't plan to write it when I woke up this morning... but here it is anyway. So if anyone else wants to write a poem this week about a favourite musician or songwriter or singer... maybe they'd like to do that in a Poetry Bus (online) stylee. Put the link in the comments and I'll post it here (as we used to... in the old days... see bottom of post). It might be more Poetry Moped than Poetry Bus but you get the idea...
So, long story short, my family had to spend a week without a drain system while a new septic tank was being installed; fortunately, we were able to rent an RV from a family friend as a ‘back-up plan’. Here is our family’s story, in the hope that you may find comfort and life lessons at someone else’s expense.
Radical Friendships in South Asia
3. Seattle Seahawks
Then the priest reads the Gospel.
group Kofi Annan’s wish to meet with the Preparatory Commission, and this is interested, and we have to improve to deal with the other party of the Committee, and explain their attitudes towards the Council. And examine this point in the office next.
Yay! e-mailing all 4 right away to get address information :) I will send your prizes out this week (along with this week's shop orders).
And hit me so hard it makes me cry?
Overall, I really liked Born Wicked. I thought it was clever and unique. With great writing. If you haven't already you should totally look into this one!
I always seem to be one of the last to jump on any bandwagon of any sort.
A major New Jersey newspaper made it very clear what it thought about student ticketing in Texas: “This is not something we should replicate….Schools should be prepping kids for college, not prison.”
Con: Maintain strong relationships; real community
Whirling, twirling round and round
b) When I am working out and I say, "I can't do anymore" she says, "do three more". And I do. She counts. Slowly. Sadist.
You will come to a place where the streets are not marked. Some windows are lighted. But mostly they’re darked. A place you could sprain both your elbow and chin! Do you dare to stay out? Do you dare to go in? How much can you lose? How much can you win?
Great things often have small, even inauspicious beginnings. The Keystone Standard Watch Company was only in business for five years, and in that time they produced a relatively small number of timepieces. The company was finally forced to file for bankruptcy in 1891 and was later sold at a sheriff's sale to a group of investors from Lancaster, Pennsylvania. These experienced entrepreneurs wanted to build high-quality timepieces in America. Before this time, almost all of the top watchmaking firms were located in Europe.
Even if we die, we will be remembered by someone,
I was a little hesitant at first since the price per container was pretty good and I was nervous I was getting another couple washes and then done type of container, but after I opened them filled them and we used them a few times, I was sold. I think these babies will last us a good while.
there ya go, thats my rant for the day.
Set on a post-apocalyptic Earth, this fantasy adventure follows the story of Avatar, the kindly, eccentric sorcerer-ruler of Montagar, a rainbow paradise inhabited by elves and fairies. Avatar's evil brother, Blackwolf, dominates Scortch, a bleak land of goblins and wraiths. When the power-hungry Blackwolf attacks Montagar, Avatar, accompanied only by a spirited young woman and a courageous elf, must enter the darkness of Scortch to save his world.
You whispered, framed in regimental gear:
Take Aluminum foil. Large enough to hold the fish, wrap it all over and seal the sides. Make it double layers. You don't want it to break when moving the pouch around. You would need two such to hold the two fishes. Dry the fish thoroughly with paper towels. Score the fish (carefully cut angular wedges on each surface of the fish, three to four of those. Helps with flavor and moisture penetration into the flesh. Also makes for better and faster cooking). Place the tomatoes around it. With a light hand, smear olive oil on all surfaces and insides. Now ground up the spices and mix with salt. And liberally apply it all over the fish and every little score and insides. Stuff the jalapeno, garlic and cilantro into the fishes and stick some in the inside the scores as well. A slab of butter on top. Carefully, wrap the fish and seal all around. The whole thing should look like a pouch. Do the same thing with the second one. Poke the top surface with fork to allow circulation. Place on oven friendly trays.
Image: Copyright Rosemary Hill
Anyone else would have either reacted in horror and killed the poor little beasties, or been more humane and simply relocated them to a nearby outdoor location. I did neither. I was so amused, I let them stay there. I bought a packet of those oddly-orange cracker sandwiches with the peanut butter filling, and put one at a time in with the mice so they'd have something to eat.
TV host: By “crap” you are referring to the Chinese-made artificial hymen?
Most Minnesota owls rely on trees, excepting perhaps the Burrowing Owl and the Short-eared Owl, and winter is a great time to get to know trees. "The Meaning of Trees," was another gift, from my sister-in-law, and this one covers most of the major species (or families?) of trees on Earth. Tree, by tree, botany, history, lore and mythology are presented to the reader. The history of trees, and their "migrations" to different spots on earth is particularly fascinating. The Horse Chestnut did not reach Europe until the 16th century, when a Flemish Ambassador saw the Turks feeding the nuts to their horses. Because some trees, like chestnuts, have heavier fruit, the wind cannot blow the species farther afield, and animals don't carry them too far, so they take longer to spread. Some tree species never leave deep ravines-- never, that is, until humans get involved.
I was stoked once we had the adorable invites complete, but we didn't stop there. I also made a King Pig pinata, and a small army of Angry Birds. I had my own little army help with some of the decorations.
Our local elected Representatives envision a 774-unit, mixed-income, mixed-use residential development for Public Place, the six acre brownfield site which runs along the Gowanus Canal and Smith Street.
The countdown has commenced...
Wifesy: “Nope, poop. It’s their poop chute.”
2. Other ideas were considered for the Easter special. One was very space opera, all dogfights and spaceships, with the Doctor arriving in the midst of a war in space. One of the races involved might have been the Chelonians - man-sized tortoises from Gareth Roberts’s Who novel The Highest Science.
8. As a pasta sauce, combine with olive oil, season with salt, serve hot or cold
That pretty set of strip piecing?
Let me modify my statement.
6. Keep in touch with your teacher – we at VESTRI OPTI love to keep up with our clients via Facebook, Twitter, LinkedIn and WordPress. Tell your teacher what you need, how she/he can help you, ask for advice.
And by wilderness, I mean Wrigleyville after a Cubs’ game.
and ceiling, 13th century.
It’s soul, unspoilt, it’s raw
No longer feeling chilled now that we are trying to get everything in the car.
I take a sponge applicator and some dark ink- I like Walnut Distress Ink and apply all round the edge of the stamped image, work it into the corners so all the white card stock edges are covered.
the internet today, it was quit shocking to say the least. I will be making
